PROLOGUE: PSALM OF THE FIRST CUT
 
The motel room smelled like cigarettes, mildew, and the kind of regret that doesn’t wash off. The wallpaper peeled in long, yellowed strips like skin after a burn. The carpet squelched when you stepped on it. Damp enough to rot. Damp enough to remember.
 
The bed sagged like a confession booth. The headboard was dented from fists. The sheets were crusted with sex and time. Stains that looked like maps. Some still wet. Some trying to forget.
 
Vivian Vale stood naked in the center of it all, black leather gloves on her hands and nothing else. Her hair clung to her shoulders in wet spirals. Her breasts were flushed. Her thighs glistened. Her mouth was smeared with Crimson Psalm—cheap lipstick that looked expensive once it dried to blood. She looked like something holy that had crawled out of a sewer. She looked like she wanted to be worshipped or burned.
 
She lit a cigarette and smoked slowly, like she was waiting for something to scream.
 
On the bed, Roy was already there. 
Naked. Tied to the headboard with one of her scarves. 
Sweaty, twitching, cock hard enough to ache. He was smiling like a man who thought he was about to come.
 
“You gonna finish what you started?” he asked. His voice cracked. It didn’t match his body. He sounded younger than he looked.
 
Vivian took one last drag, dropped the cigarette into a plastic motel cup full of ash and beer. The hiss sounded like a yes.
 
She climbed onto the bed. 
Straddled his chest. 
Her thighs pressed against his ribs, warm, slick. Her sex hovered just above his mouth—wet and open, pulsing with the kind of hunger that made men forget God.
 
She looked down at him like a warning.
 
“Eat.”
 
He didn’t argue.
 
His tongue found her fast. Sloppy. Desperate. He licked her like he thought there was something inside her that could save him.
 
She ground down slowly. Methodically. Rolling her hips in slow, controlled circles. Her breath hitched. Her eyes closed. She let it take her.
 
His hands gripped the sheets. 
His mouth was soaked.
 
She didn’t make a sound when she came. 
She just breathed harder, clenched tighter, rode the tremor until it passed.
 
Then she slid down his body.
 
Her nipples dragged across his chest. Her mouth kissed his throat. She licked a slow line from the base of his neck to the ridge of his stomach, tasting salt and motel soap.
 
When she reached his cock, she took him into her mouth without ceremony. Deep. Wet. Slow. Her lips wrapped around the head, then took him deeper until his hips jerked and he gasped.
 
She pulled back with a wet sound. Her mouth glistened.
 
“Still with me?”
 
“Fuck,” he said. “Vivian—yeah—Jesus—”
 
She grinned. A little mean.
 
“Good.”
 
She climbed back up. Reached between them. Guided him in. Her body opened around him with a slick sound that made him moan like confession.
 
She rode him slow at first. Deliberate. Her breath hot against his face. Her body strong and soft in all the right places. Her thighs flexed. Her back arched.
 
His hands gripped nothing. 
His eyes fluttered.
 
“You’re perfect,” he gasped.
 
She laughed. It wasn’t kind.
 
“No, baby. I’m just the ending.”
 
She started to move harder. 
Faster. 
Her nails dragged red lines down his chest. Her hair stuck to her skin. Her whole body moved like something possessed.
 
And then she felt it— 
the ghost. 
Ellis.
 
A hand at her back. A mouth near her ear. The phantom press of his body. Not memory. Not fantasy. Something in her spine. In her cunt. Something that had never left.
 
You always came harder when you cried, he said. She didn’t know if it was inside her head or under her skin.
 
She clenched.
 
Her orgasm surged up like violence.
 
Roy was close. She could feel it in the way his body tensed. He thought this was about him.
 
She leaned forward. Braced herself with one hand on his shoulder.
 
The other slid beneath the pillow.
 
Her fingers closed around the knife. Slim. Familiar. 
Once sealed in a glass case above their bookshelf—Ellis’s souvenir from a trip he never told her much about. He said it was decorative. Said it was dull. It wasn’t. Not anymore. 
The blade had tasted his grief and hers. 
It knew what to do.
 
Roy’s eyes squeezed shut. His mouth opened. 
His cock pulsed inside her.
 
She came as he did. 
And as he spilled into her, she slit his throat.
 
A clean slice. 
A red burst.
 
Blood hit her chest. Her throat. Her face.
 
He gurgled. 
Tried to scream. 
Failed.
 
She didn’t stop moving.
 
Her fingers rubbed her clit, fast and furious, slick with their mess. Her thighs clenched around him. Her second orgasm tore through her with a grunt, a sob, a sound that didn’t belong to anyone living.
 
When it ended, she stayed there. 
Breathing. Shaking. Watching the blood soak the sheets.
 
She slid off slowly.
 
His cock was soft now. 
His body limp. 
His blood spreading like wings.
 
She dipped two fingers between her thighs, dragged the blood-and-cum up her chest, and drew a crooked cross between her breasts. Then her lips. A blessing. A mark. Hers.
 
She uncapped her lipstick. Drew a jagged red cross above his groin. Kissed the center.
 
**Psalm 1:1 — Blessed are the fucked and forgotten.**
 
She cleaned herself with his boxers. Slow. Ritualistic. Between her legs. Down her chest. Across her mouth.
 
She dressed without hurry. 
Trench coat. Gloves. Knife sheathed.
 
The blood stayed. Like perfume.
 
Rain pounded the windows.
 
She stepped into the stairwell. 
Heels clicking like the last seconds on a countdown.
 
Down the block, a payphone lit up like a confession booth. 
Somewhere, a rookie detective would find the body, the cross, the silence.
 
Roy cooled in the sheets. 
Drained. 
Empty.
 
Exactly how she wanted him.
 
She paused in the doorway. 
Didn’t smile.
 
“He didn’t scream,” she said.
The silence lingered. Then—
“Neither did you.”

CHAPTER ONE: RED ON THE THIGH
It was the lipstick that got to her.
 
Not the slit throat. 
Not the soft cock twitching its last. 
Not the clean line across the neck or the silk scarf tying the wrists to the headboard like a favor asked and answered.
 
Not even the smell—a cocktail of sweat, sex, blood, and cheap motel soap thick enough to rot drywall.
 
It was the lipstick.
 
One mark. Crimson. Stamped high on the inner thigh.
 
Not a kiss. 
A brand.
 
Detective Elena Cruz crouched at the edge of the bed, gloves hanging limp at her side. Close enough to hear the ceiling fan hum. Close enough to see how the lipstick had bled slightly into the pores of the dead man’s skin.
 
The shade was rich. Deep. Gospel red. 
Just shy of violet.
 
Not smeared by friction. 
Pressed in—intentional. 
Lingering. Intimate.
 
A message. 
Maybe for her.
 
She didn’t know that yet. 
But her body did.
 
Behind her, Gallagher sucked on a menthol and made a sound somewhere between a chuckle and a dry cough.
 
“You seeing this shit?”
 
Cruz didn’t answer. 
She was cataloguing—scene first, body second, air last.
 
Because the room still smelled like someone had come.
 
The man on the bed looked early-thirties. Fit, but soft in the way men got when they drank alone. His face was peaceful. Half-lidded eyes. Slightly parted lips. Like he’d died moaning.
 
Cruz stood slowly, back popping. She hadn’t realized how long she’d been crouching. Her thighs ached. 
Not from exertion.
 
Gallagher exhaled smoke toward the sagging ceiling. “You thinking what I’m thinking?”
 
“I’d rather not.”
 
“Happy ending, sad finish.”
 
She didn’t flinch. 
Didn’t give him the laugh he wanted.
 
She walked the room.
 
Nothing broken. No overturned chairs. A lamp flickered but stood tall. The mirror above the dresser had a crack in the corner—one sharp line slicing her reflection across the mouth. In the fracture, she saw two versions of herself. Neither smiling.
 
Rain whispered at the windows. The neon sign outside blinked: H-T-E-L. 
The O had died sometime last summer. 
She remembered. 
She’d been here before.
 
The victim’s wrists were tied, but unbruised. 
No struggle. 
No panic.
 
She crouched again. Slower this time. Let her palm hover near the mark on the thigh.
 
Gallagher shifted behind her. “Calling card?”
 
She nodded.
 
“Woman?”
 
“Could be.”
 
He grinned. “Unless you’ve started playing rough in your spare time.”
 
She didn’t speak. Just pulled on a glove. 
Touched the edge of the print.
 
Still tacky. 
Still fresh.
 
Not rage. Ritual.
 
A uniform stepped into the doorway, chewing on something fried. “Jesus. You think this is Prophet copycat shit?” 
Gallagher didn’t even look up. “Nah. He liked ‘em scared.” 
“Yeah, well. This one looks like he came twice.” 
He laughed at his own joke. No one else did.
 
She stood. Took a breath. 
Held it.
 
The whole room felt like foreplay. 
Like whatever happened here hadn’t ended. 
Just… paused.
 
She looked back at the mirror. 
The crack split her mouth clean in two.
 
Later, a tech bagged the scarf. Another took photos of what might’ve been a fingerprint smudge on the dresser. None of it mattered as much as the mark.
 
That lipstick wasn’t evidence. 
It was prophecy.
 

***
The stairwell reeked of piss and incense. 
Rain slapped the windows like a jealous lover. 
She thought of Blue in Green. 
She didn’t know why. The mood fit. Sad. Slow. Like being touched by something that already knew how it would end.
 
Gallagher lingered, talking to the night manager. 
The woman three doors down said she saw a blonde leave. 
Or maybe she wasn’t blonde. Maybe the light just made her look holy.
 
Cruz didn’t wait. 
She stepped into the night like it owed her something.
 

***
Her apartment was silent. 
Sanctified.
 
She stripped in the bathroom. 
Shirt first. Bra next. Slacks fell like ritual.
 
She stared at herself in the mirror—face, mouth, neck. 
The places the woman might’ve kissed him. 
The places she didn’t dare touch.
 
The cabinet opened with a groan. 
No Crimson Psalm.
 
She picked something soft. Pink. Apologetic.
 
Applied it. 
Watched.
 
It didn’t look like power. 
It looked like regret.
 
She wiped it away. 
The tissue bloomed pale, then flushed.
 
Her hand hovered over the waistband of her underwear. 
She didn’t move.
 
If she touched herself now, it wouldn’t be for relief. 
It would be surrender.
 
She went to bed wet. 
Didn’t sleep.
 

***
The report hit her desk just after 4 a.m.
 
SHADE: CRIMSON PSALM
 
She whispered it like a prayer. 
Like a name.
 
The Polaroid had been tucked behind the file. 
She hadn’t looked.
 
Until now.
 
She held it gently, fingers brushing the glossy edge. 
Held it between her palms like scripture.
 
That mark wasn’t a signature. 
It was an invitation.
 
And somewhere, a woman with blood on her thighs and lipstick on her teeth was already writing the next psalm.
 
And Cruz knew— 
The next verse would be about her.

CHAPTER TWO: HER MOUTH WAS A CLUE
Detective Elena Cruz stood in the hallway outside Interview 2, fingers clenched around a Styrofoam cup gone soft with sweat.
 
Behind the glass, the suspect waited. Not pacing. Not crying. Just sitting. One leg crossed over the other. Elbows resting on the chair arms like a throne. Hair still damp. Eyes like they already knew the ending.
 
Vivian Vale.
 
Cruz didn’t know what she’d expected. 
Not this.
 
Not the poise. Not the calm. Not the slow, surgical way Vivian had turned to look at the mirror—*not the camera, the mirror*—and smiled.
 
That smile had no innocence in it. 
Only memory.
 
“She’s not what I thought,” Cruz said, voice flat.
 
Gallagher stood next to her, reeking of coffee and old smoke. “You mean she’s not screaming or asking for her lawyer like a good little girl?”
 
Cruz didn’t answer. She was watching Vivian’s hands. Still. Relaxed. But the left one twitched every now and then. A tremor or a tell. Maybe just blood memory.
 
“She requested to speak to you,” Gallagher said. “Said she liked your mouth.”
 
Cruz turned.
 
“Excuse me?”
 
He shrugged. “Those were her words. Didn’t say shit until you were on the list. We had her dead to rights on trespassing, indecent exposure, possibly assault—”
 
“Possibly,” Cruz cut in.
 
“Yeah, well. No one’s pressing charges. No surprise there.” He scratched the back of his neck. “You ask me, she’s not the killer. She’s a fan.”
 
Cruz looked back through the glass.
 
“She’s not a fan,” she said. “She’s the message.”
 
***
**Later, inside the room, Cruz sat across from Vivian Vale and placed the file between them like a sacrament.**
 
No tape recorder. No witness. Just two women, a folder, and the low hum of the lights.
 
Vivian leaned back. No handcuffs. No fear. 
Just that same look—like she was waiting for Cruz to admit something first.
 
“You know why I’m here?” Cruz asked.
 
Vivian smiled.
 
“I know why I came.”
 
The silence sat thick between them. 
Not tense—*calculated*. Vivian Vale was the kind of woman who wore silence like perfume. Cruz felt it in her lungs.
 
She opened the file.
 
“Your name came up during the investigation at the H–Tel.”
 
Vivian didn’t blink. “Is that what it’s called now?”
 
Cruz didn’t respond. She tapped the corner of the folder, slow and deliberate. “We found your print on the edge of a mirror. Left hand. Thumb.”
 
Vivian flexed her fingers, glanced at her palm like it might tell her something new. “I always did hate my left side.”
 
Cruz kept her face neutral. 
But inside: *What the fuck kind of answer is that?*
 
“You were seen leaving the premises by a witness. Female. Third floor. Said you looked ‘holy.’” 
She let that word hang.
 
Vivian leaned forward, eyes half-lidded. “And do you agree?”
 
Cruz paused. The air shifted. 
Not with heat. With memory.
 
Vivian smelled like rain and copper and something Cruz couldn’t name—something that made her think of sweat on clean sheets and bruises she didn’t want to hide.
 
“I’m not here for theology,” Cruz said.
 
“No,” Vivian murmured. “You’re here because you believe in something.”
 
Cruz’s jaw clenched. “I believe in evidence.”
 
Vivian tilted her head. “Is that what I am?”
 

***
**Cruz shifted. Not visibly—but enough.**
 
This wasn’t how interrogations went. The suspect didn’t ask *her* the questions. And they didn’t look at her like that. Like they were remembering a night they never lived.
 
She flipped a photo from the file. The crime scene. 
Roy. The lipstick. The mark.
 
Vivian’s expression didn’t change.
 
“This was deliberate,” Cruz said.
 
Vivian nodded. “Yes.”
 
“You admit you were there?”
 
Vivian smiled, slow and tired. “Detective… I’m always there. Whether you see me or not.”
 
Cruz stared. Not at her face. At her throat. 
There—just under the skin—was a pulse. Steady. Unafraid.
 
She wanted to reach out and touch it. 
*Just to feel something alive.*
 
“Who was he to you?” Cruz asked.
 
Vivian didn’t answer. Just reached for the photo, turned it sideways like she was studying a painting. Her fingertips grazed the thigh in the image. 
Right where the lipstick bloomed.
 
Cruz felt something catch in her throat.
 
She wanted to say: *You kissed him there.* 
She wanted to say: *Did you come before or after the knife?* 
She wanted to say: *I dreamt of you before I knew your name.*
 
Instead, she said: 
“I think you want to be caught.”
 
Vivian finally looked up. 
Something flickered behind her eyes. Not fear.
 
Pity.
 
“No,” she said. “I want to be understood.”
 

***
Vivian’s eyes stayed on the photo like it had something sacred to tell her. Like the blood on Roy’s thigh spelled out a sermon.
 
Cruz leaned forward—not too close. Just enough.
 
“Your lipstick,” she said. “Crimson Psalm. Same shade found at the scene. Same pressure mark. Same line pattern.”
 
Vivian nodded once. “It’s discontinued.”
 
Cruz arched a brow. “That supposed to make it special?”
 
Vivian met her gaze. “That makes it rare.”
 
Cruz closed the file slowly, deliberately.
 
“And you leave your rare, discontinued signature on a man who turns up dead, tied to a bed, cut clean across the throat—but you expect me to believe you’re just some lost woman looking for meaning in motel rooms?”
 
Vivian smiled. “No. I expect you to believe whatever you need to in order to sleep tonight.”
 
Cruz didn’t flinch.
 
She stood, file tucked under her arm, and looked down at Vivian like a doctor deciding which wound to leave open.
 
“You like games,” she said. “Fine. Play them. But not with me.”
 
Vivian’s smile didn’t waver, but her eyes narrowed just slightly. A flicker. Less than a blink.
 
Cruz turned toward the door, then stopped.
 
“One last thing,” she said.
 
Vivian waited.
 
“If you wanted to be understood,” Cruz said, “you should’ve picked someone who didn’t know how to read.”
 
She didn’t wait for a response. 
The door clicked shut behind her.
 

***
Outside, Gallagher was waiting, holding two paper cups and pretending the hallway didn’t stink of bleach and fluorescent fatigue.
 
“Well?” he asked.
 
Cruz took the cup without looking at him. “She’s not a suspect.”
 
Gallagher frowned. “You sure?”
 
“She’s not a suspect,” Cruz repeated. “She’s a beginning.”
 
Gallagher laughed, but Cruz wasn’t joking. 
And she didn’t look back.

CHAPTER 3: SACRED DISRUPTION
The rain whispered.
Not a pour — a hiss.
It tapped against the windshield like it was testing her.
 
The car steamed from the inside.
She hadn’t moved in twenty minutes.
Vinyl squeaked when her thigh shifted.
 
Silk slip damp under the wool coat.
Not soaked — saturated.
From the walk, from the heat, from the want.
Her inner thighs stuck with every breath.
Her skin clung like it remembered hands that hadn’t touched her yet.
 
She didn’t crack the window.
Didn’t need air.
She needed the press.
 
Across the street: The Chapel.
Red bulb over the door. No sign. No name.
Just the kind of building you find yourself inside, then pretend you meant to go.
 
Sin’s waiting room.
The music leaked out in waves — moaning slowed down, bass like breath through teeth.
Every man who walked in wore guilt like aftershave.
 
He was already inside.
Daniel Carrow.
Third night this week.
Same time. Same door.
Different girl. Same laugh.
 
One of those laughs men fake so the world doesn’t hear the zipper.
He reeked of cocky cologne and half-washed shame.
The kind of man who never changed his sheets, but changed his story.
 
Vivian watched without blinking.
Watched the doorman pretend to check ID.
Watched the girl — sparkly denim skirt, knockoff clutch — fumble a crumpled bill into her bra.
Watched Carrow nod like the Lord had blessed his choices.
 
She didn’t write the psalm yet.
Just traced it on her inner wrist.
Nail to skin.
Small pressure. Repetition. Intention.
 
Psalm 69.
Not all gospels need a priest.
Some just need sweat.
 
The rearview mirror was cracked.
She tilted it anyway.
 
Her mouth. Bare.
Lips parted like they’d forgotten why.
 
She took out the Crimson Psalm.
Drew it across her upper lip.
Then lower.
Smeared it with her thumb — not to blend. Just to wound it right.
 
Ellis had kissed her like this once.
Mid-smear.
Smeared her back.
 
Said her mouth looked like scripture and tasted like a dare.
He died with her name between his teeth.
 
She touched the mirror.
Drew one line down the center.
Split herself in two.
 
One Vivian watched.
The other waited.
 
The matchbook on the passenger seat was still damp.
She lit one anyway.
Let it burn to the quick.
 
The smoke curled toward her mouth.
She opened it. Let the ash settle on her tongue like a secret.
 
The radio hissed Falco’s sermon.
Outside, the bass from The Chapel pulsed through the street —
moans, looped and slowed like someone turned fucking into prayer.
 
Vivian smiled.
Not at the lie.
At the rhythm.
 
She’d seen that kind of man.
Bible in one hand. Bleeding lip in the other.
 
She stepped out of the car.
Didn’t shake off the rain.
Didn’t fix her coat.
 
Just walked.
Her inner thighs sang with each step.
A psalm already written in silk.
The rain whispered.
Not a pour — a hiss.
It tapped against the windshield like it was testing her.
 
The car steamed from the inside.
She hadn’t moved in twenty minutes.
Vinyl squeaked when her thigh shifted.
 
Silk slip damp under the wool coat.
Not soaked — saturated.
From the walk, from the heat, from the want.
Her inner thighs stuck with every breath.
Her skin clung like it remembered hands that hadn’t touched her yet.
 
She didn’t crack the window.
Didn’t need air.
She needed the press.
 
Across the street: The Chapel.
Red bulb over the door. No sign. No name.
Just the kind of building you find yourself inside, then pretend you meant to go.
 
Sin’s waiting room.
The music leaked out in waves — moaning slowed down, bass like breath through teeth.
Every man who walked in wore guilt like aftershave.
 
He was already inside.
Daniel Carrow.
Third night this week.
Same time. Same door.
Different girl. Same laugh.
 
One of those laughs men fake so the world doesn’t hear the zipper.
He reeked of cocky cologne and half-washed shame.
The kind of man who never changed his sheets, but changed his story.
 
Vivian watched without blinking.
Watched the doorman pretend to check ID.
Watched the girl — sparkly denim skirt, knockoff clutch — fumble a crumpled bill into her bra.
Watched Carrow nod like the Lord had blessed his choices.
 
She didn’t write the psalm yet.
Just traced it on her inner wrist.
Nail to skin.
Small pressure. Repetition. Intention.
 
Psalm 69.
Not all gospels need a priest.
Some just need sweat.
 
The rearview mirror was cracked.
She tilted it anyway.
 
Her mouth. Bare.
Lips parted like they’d forgotten why.
 
She took out the Crimson Psalm.
Drew it across her upper lip.
Then lower.
Smeared it with her thumb — not to blend. Just to wound it right.
 
Ellis had kissed her like this once.
Mid-smear.
Smeared her back.
 
Said her mouth looked like scripture and tasted like a dare.
He died with her name between his teeth.
 
She touched the mirror.
Drew one line down the center.
Split herself in two.
 
One Vivian watched.
The other waited.
 
The matchbook on the passenger seat was still damp.
She lit one anyway.
Let it burn to the quick.
 
The smoke curled toward her mouth.
She opened it. Let the ash settle on her tongue like a secret.
 
The radio hissed Falco’s sermon.
Outside, the bass from The Chapel pulsed through the street —
moans, looped and slowed like someone turned fucking into prayer.
 
Vivian smiled.
Not at the lie.
At the rhythm.
 
She’d seen that kind of man.
Bible in one hand. Bleeding lip in the other.
 
She stepped out of the car.
Didn’t shake off the rain.
Didn’t fix her coat.
 
Just walked.
Her inner thighs sang with each step.
A psalm already written in silk.

***
The red bulb above the door didn’t blink.
It throbbed.
Slow. Pulsed like breath held too long.
 
She stepped into it like she’d been summoned.
 
Inside: velvet and ruin.
Stained carpet. Candle wax stuck to mirrored walls.
Perfume thick as bleach, sweat baked into every velvet seam.
Mildew. Smoke. Old cum and fresh regret.
 
The place smelled like a chapel that forgot how to forgive.
 
Cigarette haze curled around the chandeliers.
Every light was pink, except the one that flickered green over the tip jar.
 
The sound system ran on hope and 8-tracks.
No DJ. No decks. Just a stack of tapes looped into oblivion.
 
Tonight’s loop: porn funk slowed to a crawl.
Moans, bent and holy.
One synth note stretched too long — a climax that never finished.
 
Behind the bar, an old radio wheezed Falco’s sermon.
 
"...Mayor Falco's Clean Hands Initiative promises a moral city by '78..."
“Virtue is not a choice. It’s an order.”
 
The voice had that politician polish — slick as gospel, smug as soap.
It bled into the bassline like a man trying to fuck through a prayer.
 
Vivian walked past a man at the bar mouthing along to Falco’s speech.
Not mocking — reciting. Like he believed it.
He was hard under the table.
Holding a rosary.
 
A girl passed her near the bar. Too much blush, not enough silk.
“Hey—”
Vivian turned slightly. Not enough to be caught.
 
The girl smiled. “You scheduled?”
Vivian didn’t answer.
“Right,” the girl nodded. “Talent.”
Then turned like she hadn’t said anything at all.
 
Every booth was a confessional.
Every girl moved like she’d already confessed.
Like she’d been forgiven and forgot what it cost.
 
Vivian let the gaze gather first.
Some men looked down.
The smart ones didn’t look at all.
 
She moved slow.
Let her heels speak for her.
Let the silk cling. Let the gaze accumulate.
 
The silk clung like blood that hadn’t dried.
Each step made the hem kiss her calves.
Like the dress remembered what she’d done last night.
 
She saw women with psalms inked on their thighs.
A dancer whose knees were raw.
Another girl with glitter in her tear ducts.
Someone had stuffed a ten into the top of her fishnet.
It stuck to the skin like it didn’t want to be spent.
 
One of the tattoos was half-smudged.
Sweat had warped the verse.
Vivian read the first line.
Didn’t read the rest.
Ellis used to say scripture meant more when it bled.
 
Vivian met eyes with none of them.
She didn’t look away, either.
 
Carrow was in the back booth.
Drinking something brown.
Same shirt. Same chain.
His ring caught the light — emblem onyx, not wedding finger.
 
Men like him always had one detail too clean.
He wore a wrinkle in his collar but polished that ring.
Like he wanted you to know he wasn’t pretending — just tired of hiding.
 
A girl was straddling him.
Too thin. Too numb.
Moving like she was somewhere else, waiting to come back to her body.
 
She mouthed something.
Not a moan. Not a word.
Just sound with no anchor.
 
Carrow whispered in her ear.
She didn’t react.
 
He touched her throat when he said it.
Like he was used to women nodding when their windpipe pulsed.
 
Vivian clocked the bulge.
The watch pause.
The glance toward the mirrored wall.
 
He wanted to be seen.
 
She didn’t need to watch more.
She’d seen enough men mistake repetition for ritual.
Carrow came here like it was church.
Said the same prayers.
Expected the same God.
 
She walked straight toward him.
Unfastened her trenchcoat one shoulder at a time.
 
The silk slip underneath clung to her in all the ways it was meant to.
 
He looked.
Then stared.
Then smiled like a man who thought he’d earned the right to be lucky.
 
He didn’t smile at her.
He smiled at the idea of her.
The kind of man who thought women like Vivian were written for him to read out loud.
 
“Let me buy you a drink,” he said.
 
She tilted her head.
Didn’t smile.
Didn’t blink.
Just stepped forward until the heat between them fogged the mirror behind his booth.
 
She leaned in.
Let the slip cling harder.
Let her breath hit his mouth like prophecy.
 
“Only if you sin first.”

***
The motel key tag was cracked plastic.
Room 9.
No questions.
 
It stuck in the lock.
Like the door wanted to think about it first.
She pushed it open with the back of her hand.
Left the rain behind her, but kept the weight.
 
He walked in first.
Left the door open just long enough to see if she’d follow.
 
She didn’t rush.
Men like that liked to be chased.
She let the gap narrow on its own.
 
She did.
But slower.
Letting the rain drip off her coat like it had something to say.
 
“Mini bar’s empty,” he muttered, peeking in the fridge.
No ice bucket. No glasses.
 
He said it like it was a dealbreaker.
Like she might leave if the water was warm.
 
Just dust, two dead roaches, and a Gideon Bible under the mattress—
spine torn. Page corners bent.
The kind of book people opened for comfort, not confession.
 
She didn’t answer.
Just stood near the mirror.
Watched him pretend to be casual.
 
He adjusted his shirt.
Rolled up the sleeves like he was about to make breakfast.
She caught her own reflection in the mirror.
Mouth bare. Eyes already gone.
 
He loosened his collar like it mattered.
Unbuckled his belt like he expected applause.
 
“You like a real man?” he asked, running a hand down his stomach.
“No razors. No lies.”
 
She smiled without warmth.
“Don’t worry. I’ve cut cleaner men than you.”
 
She stepped closer.
The hem was still wet.
It slapped softly against her calves.
She didn’t shrug it off. She peeled it.
One shoulder. Then the other.
Like she was offering skin to the flame.
 
He reached for the lapels.
“Let me see what God made.”
 
She let him reach.
Let him think he was leading.
Like letting a child hold the match and call it fire.
 
She shrugged out of it.
One shoulder. Then the other.
Let it fall.
 
His eyes dropped.
His breath caught.
“Jesus fucking Christ.”
 
He said it like the room had disappeared.
Like her breasts had cured him.
She tilted her head.
Watched his mouth open. Stay open.
 
Vivian didn’t flinch.
Just tilted her head.
 
“I don’t do communion.”
 
She could already feel the knife in her palm.
Not physically. But the weight knew when it was needed.
 
He dropped to his knees like he was about to propose.
But his mouth didn’t ask questions.
It just opened.
 
He was already on her, nose first.
Pressed between her breasts, licking like he was searching for proof.
Mouth greedy.
Breath wet.
 
He licked her like she had answers written in sweat.
Mouth sliding between her curves, aimless.
His tongue missed both nipples twice before finding one and sucking like it might bless him.
 
Then the other. Then back again.
Every suck louder than it should’ve been.
His whole face mashed between her breasts like a drunk infant looking for his goddamn origin story.
 
“You taste like salvation,” he groaned.
 
She looked down at him like she was already bored.
“If you’re lucky, this is purgatory.”
 
She didn’t stop him.
She just let him degrade himself for a minute longer.
Watched his face blur in her cleavage.
His tongue miss the point again and again.
 
Ellis had kissed her like this once—
slow, reverent.
Not suckling. Not starving.
Carrow didn’t kiss. He consumed.
 
Her hand moved behind her body, slow.
She could do it without looking.
Knife—cold spine.
Lipstick—warm from earlier.
Matchbook—soft at the edge, slightly damp.
 
She set them on the nightstand like relics.
The knife landed with a whisper.
Lipstick rolled once, like it might decide something.
The matchbook stuck faintly to her fingertip before letting go.
 
He didn’t see.
He was too busy trying to nurse from her like redemption was under her skin.
 
She slid her hand through his hair, slow.
Fisted it.
Not gentle. Not cruel. Just done.
Pushed him back onto the bed with the same pressure you’d use to flush a toilet.
 
“You ever get off just grinding?” he asked, breath hot.
“Cause I got a thing for watching—”
 
He didn’t finish.
She was already on top of him.
Straddling his chest, her thighs pinning his arms.
Slip riding up, heat slick and sacred between her thighs.
 
“Shit. You’re soaked.”
 
He said it like he earned it.
Like her wetness was applause.
 
She didn’t respond.
Started to grind.
Small, brutal circles.
 
The silk stuck to her ass, damp at the edges.
His stomach slicked with her heat as she moved—
not fast, not performative.
Just honest friction.
Like she was trying to erase something.
 
“Goddamn,” he breathed.
 
She didn’t hear him.
She heard Ellis.
The sigh he never let out.
The gasp he died holding in.
 
She bit her shoulder.
Felt the old scar split.
Felt Ellis somewhere between her breath and her thighs.
 
That scar had teeth.
It opened like it remembered being wanted.
Her climax started in her spine.
 
“Say his name.”
 
He blinked.
“Whose?”
 
Ellis.
Not spoken.
Just the syllable vibrating through her teeth.
 
Wrong answer.
 
The knife was already in her hand.
He didn’t see it until it was too close to believe.
Pressed between his ribs like a question.
 
She didn’t stab.
She offered it.
 
The knife in one hand, the psalm in her hips.
 
She pressed it down, slow.
Through sternum.
Through heat.
Through the part of her that still wanted someone to beg.
 
He gurgled like he wanted to speak.
No words came. Just blood.
She ground down harder.
 
It hit her like a sob she hadn’t earned.
A twitch in her gut.
A tremble in her thighs.
She came like his death made room for her body again.
 
She didn’t move right away.
Just stayed on top of him, thighs tight around his ribs.
Her breath hitched once.
Not grief. Not release. Something else.
A weight shifting inside her spine.
 
Her knees left imprints in his skin.
A hair clung to her cheek, stuck by sweat.
She didn’t brush it away.
 
His chest still leaked.
Not gush. Not fountain.
Just a thick rhythm.
It pulsed once more. Then stopped.
 
She slid off.
Bare feet to motel carpet.
Picked up the lipstick.
 
Her thighs were wet—
from him, from her, from the sacred crossfade of sweat and blood.
She didn’t wipe it away.
 
Repainted her mouth.
The smear at the corner — she left it.
Imperfection was gospel.
 
She overlined the bottom lip slightly.
Made her mouth look fuller.
Not for vanity. For reminder.
 
She dipped her fingers into the blood pooling at his waist.
It was already cooling.
 
It clung in strands.
Red and darker red.
She pressed two fingers in.
Drew slow.
 
She wrote across his chest, slow.
PSALM 69
 
The 9 curled like a serpent.
The blood thinned at the tail.
 
She walked to the mirror.
Didn’t look at her face.
Looked at her breath.
Fogged it.
Wrote it backward with her finger.
 
Then dragged one line down the glass — vertical.
A veil. A split.
 
Two women:
One who climaxed.
One who killed.
 
She touched the glass where her eyes should be.
They were fogged out.
Good.
 
She kissed the mirror.
Not with her lips.
With her absence.
 
Then walked out, trenchcoat open, slip clinging to her hips.
Thighs streaked.
One heel louder than the other.
No apology.
 
The door clicked shut behind her like it was sealing a tomb.

***
The motel reeked.
 
Sweat. Semen. Rusted plumbing. 
The kind of heat that didn’t just hang — it clung. 
It got under fingernails. In hair. Behind the eyes.
 
The AC was broken. 
The blood hadn’t clotted yet.
 
Cruz stood just inside the door. 
Didn’t speak. Didn’t move. 
The scene was loud without sound.
 
He was face up. 
Mouth open — like he’d died mid-breath, mid-thrust, trying to say yes. 
Chest split clean. No hesitation marks. 
Just scripture.
 
**Psalm 69**, written with two fingers. 
Blood trailed from the “S” like a tear someone wiped and missed.
 
There were no signs of forced entry. 
No broken glass. No smudged prints. 
No panic.
 
No condom. 
Pants undone. Belt off. Zipper halfway. 
No semen in the underwear — but pre-cum soaked the waistband.
 
His wallet was untouched. 
Watch still on. 
Shirt rolled beneath him like it had been pulled, not removed.
 
This wasn’t robbery. 
It was a sermon.
 
A slip-print smeared the man’s stomach — wet and low. 
Lace at the hip. Thin red fabric. Silk. 
Too perfect to be accident. 
Whoever rode him knew exactly when to stop.
 
And the word carved into his chest: 
**PSALM 69** 
written like it meant forgiveness.
 
The cuts were slow. Clean. 
Each letter deliberate. 
The “9” was smudged — not jagged, not sloppy. 
Sweat-slicked. Like the killer came after it.
 
Gallagher was behind her, too loud. 
Scratching notes he wouldn’t read later.
 
“No way a woman did this,” he muttered. 
“Too clean. Too—”
 
He kicked an evidence marker. 
Didn’t notice. Kept talking.
 
“Too elegant,” he said eventually, like the word was a slur.
 
“You think it’s a sex worker gone psycho?”
 
Cruz didn’t turn. 
Didn’t answer. 
Didn’t need to.
 
“He paid for silence,” she said. 
“She gave him scripture.”
 
Gallagher stopped talking. For once.
 
Cruz crouched.
 
Low. Close. Almost reverent.
 
The evidence marker he’d kicked now leaned. 
She reached for it — but paused. 
The angle felt intentional.
 
There was a heel print in blood near the mirror. 
Not part of a struggle. 
No drag, no stumble. 
She had stood there. Still. Watching herself.
 
A sermon in posture.
 
Gallagher again. 
“Think she let him finish first?”
 
Cruz didn’t blink. 
“You think that matters?”
 
He didn’t answer.
 
She stood. 
Not fast. Not slow. Just done.
 
The smell stuck to her teeth.
 
This wasn’t a killing. 
This was a ritual. 
And someone had been reborn.

***
The door stuck when she pushed it open. 
She didn’t bother locking it behind her. 
Just dropped her keys and coat and stood there a minute. 
 
No lights. 
Just the amber lamp over the stove. 
The hum of the fridge. 
The taste of motel air still in her mouth.
 
She hadn’t eaten. 
Didn’t want to. 
 
She peeled off her shirt. 
Sat at the kitchen table in her slacks and bra, staring at the manila folder. 
The one Gallagher called “Open and Shut.” 
 
She hadn’t opened it since they left the scene. 
Her hands smelled like latex. 
And blood. 
And motel soap.
 
She flipped the folder open. 
Laid out the photos. 
One by one.
 
Carrow’s body. 
Mouth still open. 
Thighs slack. 
Chest carved. 
**PSALM 69**
 
It was too neat. 
Too clean for panic. 
Too wet for staging. 
 
She turned the image sideways. 
Didn’t help. 
 
She went to the previous scene. 
Roy Marsh. 
Prologue victim. 
**“PSALM OF THE FIRST CUT”**
 
She blinked. 
Her lips moved silently. 
Tried to recite the verses from memory. 
 
There was no Psalm 69. 
Not in any Bible she’d ever read. 
No “First Cut” either.
 
They weren’t scriptures. 
They were titles. 
Like chapters in a book only one person was writing.
 
She ran a fingertip across the blood on Carrow’s chest in the photo. 
It left a red line across her nail. 
She hadn’t noticed the paper was still tacky.
 
“Why him?” she whispered. 
“Why this?”
 
The body didn’t look violated. 
It looked used. 
He hadn’t been attacked. 
He’d been seen.
 
She made it to the bathroom. 
Didn’t turn on the light. 
Just kicked the door shut and leaned against it. 
 
No noise. 
No thought. 
Just the hum of the fridge echoing down the hallway, and the way her own breath sounded like someone else’s.
 
She didn’t sit right away. 
She peeled her slacks open first. 
Not fast. Not clean. 
Zipper caught once — she didn’t fix it. 
Let it snag. Let it bite.
 
Her panties were still damp from the heat. 
Not her own. Not entirely. 
The scent of blood and motel sweat clung to her thighs. 
She didn’t wipe it.
 
She sat on the toilet lid like she’d done it before. 
Shirt still on. Bra pinched at the edge. 
The fabric cold where it stuck to her back.
 
The mirror across the sink was fogged. 
But she hadn’t run the water. 
It fogged from her breath. From something else. 
A pulse in the room she hadn’t brought in with her.
 
She spread her knees just enough. 
One foot on tile. One heel kicked against the tub. 
The hem of her slacks still brushing her calf.
 
She slid a hand down. 
Pressed through cotton.
 
Didn’t move. 
Just stayed there. 
Let the pressure announce itself.
 
She didn’t unzip the rest. 
Didn’t touch skin. 
There was something filthier in not looking.
 
She rubbed small. 
Not slow. Not fast. 
Just *there*. 
Rough circles. 
Fabric grinding against fabric, against clit, against heat that wasn’t just hers.
 
No moan. 
Just breath. 
Tighter.
 
The fabric caught on her and stayed. 
She pressed harder. 
It wasn’t about pleasure. 
It was the *force*. 
Like she could push something back in.
 
Her head dropped.
 
She imagined the woman.
 
Not her face. 
Just the hips. The thighs. The way she moved. 
The way the man didn’t know he was already dead.
 
She wasn’t turned on. 
She was *possessed*. 
 
Her fingers curled. 
Her knees shook. 
She rocked once, twice, no rhythm. Just muscle memory and regret.
 
And then—
 
A pulse behind her eyes. 
A gasp that wasn’t breath. 
Her body twitched.
 
She came like a theft. 
Like someone had stolen the part of her that said no.
 
She didn’t wipe her hand. 
Didn’t move right away.
 
Just stared at the mirror. 
Still fogged. 
Her eyes gone. 
Her mouth open.
 
She looked like she’d been watched.
 
She looked like a woman who would never be clean again.

CHAPTER 4: THE HARNESS AND THE HALO
The camera trembled slightly.
Handheld. Too close. Street-level sweat.
Mayor Falco’s face filled the frame.
Slick hair. Cheap conviction.
A mouth that smiled without softening.
Behind him, the courthouse steps were lined with red-white banners:
CLEAN HANDS. PURE CITY. 1978 STARTS WITH SANCTITY.
He adjusted the mic. Didn’t clear his throat. Didn’t need to.
“Virtue,” he said, “is not a lifestyle. It’s a duty.”
The crowd split between applause and rain.
It was the wrong kind of drizzle—fine, sour, uncommitted.
Like the city was trying to piss without getting caught.
Cruz stood near the barricades, badge turned inward.
No press credentials. No notepad. Just presence.
Gallagher had bailed ten minutes ago—“Fuck a sermon.”
She stayed.
Something in her liked to hear the lie from the man who told it best.
Falco’s voice cut through the static:
“Our city has suffered too long under moral fatigue.
It’s not poverty that degrades us. It’s perversion.
And we will no longer confuse indulgence with identity.”
His mouth curled around the last word like it tasted foreign.
Identity.
That’s what this was about.
Not crime. Not virtue.
Just the fear of someone wanting without apology.
A woman near Cruz pushed against the barricade.
Smudged lipstick. Sharp eyes. She held a protest sign—handwritten, red marker bleeding through cardboard:
PSALM 6:6 — MY BED IS FLOODED WITH TEARS AND SPIT
Cruz blinked.
The woman met her gaze. Didn’t smile. Didn’t flinch.
Just turned and disappeared into the crowd.
Onstage, Falco raised his arms like a preacher mid-conversion.
“We are launching this new initiative with leaders from every sacred order—
priests, deacons, parish figures of moral strength.”
His eyes scanned the crowd. Landed on a thin man near the back of the platform.
Father Jared Knox.
White collar. Black umbrella.
Smile like an apology that didn’t need to be said.
Falco gestured toward him.
“Men like Father Knox have guided our youth with quiet clarity for decades.
Their faith anchors this city.”
The camera panned wide.
Cruz saw it—the space between Knox’s hands.
Clasped too tight.
Knuckles pale.
His pinky bandage slightly bloodstained.
She didn’t move.
Didn’t note it.
Just… filed it.
Falco wrapped up.
“This city will be clean by the summer solstice.
No filth in our pulpits. No filth in our bedrooms.
God is watching.”
Applause.
Then the mic cut.
The rain came harder.
Cruz didn’t stay for the hymn.
She turned and walked.
Her jacket clung slightly. Not from the rain.
The psalm on that woman’s sign was still in her head.
Not because it was vulgar.
Because it was true.

***
The motel room wasn’t quiet. It breathed in sweat and old perfume, the air thick with the damp ghosts of every orgasm, lie, and low sob it had ever held. It exhaled slowly through the broken vent in the ceiling, wheezing heat and mildew like lungs collapsing after prayer. Like it had been holding its breath for decades, and finally gave out.
The man knelt on the mattress, hands flat, ass lifted, cock already half-hard and twitching. He had asked her to fuck him. Said it like a dare. Like he thought that kind of surrender was brave.
Vivian Vale didn’t speak. She just turned her back to him, knelt beside the red velvet bag she’d laid out with slow deliberation, and unzipped it like a reliquary.
Inside: black leather, glinting buckles, lube already catching light. The strap-on she pulled out was thick, weighted, veined with cruel detail—a cock made for contrition, not pleasure. Each strap tightened with intention. Her breath was steady. Her movements ritualized. She wasn’t getting dressed. She was preparing the altar. Somewhere—faint, quiet, wrong-skin familiar—she felt a breath not her own. Not Ellis. Not this man. Something watching. Something wet with want. She didn’t turn. She didn’t need to. Whoever it was… they’d feel this too. The leather cinched tight across her hips, grounding her. There was a heaviness in her chest, like the pressure before a sob that never came. Her belly was hot, coiled—not arousal, not quite—it was need sharpened by grief, a holy ache begging for release.
“On your knees,” she said.
He obeyed, naked and eager, bracing himself on trembling hands. His back curved downward, offering himself up with the kind of practiced desperation that made Vivian almost bored. But not quite. His ass was already slick with sweat. His cock, flushed and twitching, hung heavy between his thighs, dripping onto the motel bedspread.
She climbed onto the bed behind him, one gloved hand on his lower back, the other guiding her mouth between his cheeks. She rimmed him gently at first—soft, exploratory licks, more ritual than tease—but when he gasped, she didn’t stop. Her tongue pressed deeper. He whimpered. His fingers clenched the sheets.
She entered him slowly. The cock moved inside like it belonged there. His body shook, then adjusted, and he groaned into the mattress, a low, raw sound that spread through the room like incense. Her rhythm was crueler than her voice. Each thrust deliberate. Hard. Punishing. He sobbed by the fourth. Begged by the sixth.
Vivian didn’t answer him. She wasn’t fucking a man—she was unmaking a memory. Every thrust was a conjuring. She timed them to the cadence of Ellis’s breath the night he died—sharp inhale, held tremble, broken exhale. She didn’t just remember it. She was inside it again, rewriting it with every inch she drove into this stranger. This was resurrection. This was revenge.
When she pulled the silk scarf from the headboard, he looked up. “Please,” he whispered. But he didn’t resist.
She looped it around his throat. Tightened it with one hand. Her other stayed on his hip, holding him still. She kept thrusting. She wrapped the silk around his throat the way she used to tie her robe the night Ellis died. Same fingers. Same calm. Same breath that didn’t know what was about to be taken.
“Say his name,” she said.
He tried. Maybe. It didn’t matter. The breath left his lungs before the sound did. His orgasm hit mid-asphyxia—his body convulsed, his cock spasmed, semen splattered across the sheets.
Then silence. He collapsed. His eyes stayed open.
She held the scarf a moment longer. Let the quiet settle. Then let go.
She unbuckled the harness, slipped out of it with a quiet grace, and wiped her thigh with the scarf before tossing it onto his body. She looked at his face—still caught in a look of stunned gratitude—and touched her own lip. The smear of Crimson Psalm was still there.
She walked to the window. Her palm rested on the sill, leaving a faint smudge in the condensation. Just for her.
She lit a cigarette with blood still on her fingers. Inhaled slow. Exhaled slower.
“That one’s for Ellis,” she murmured.
For a second, she thought she heard his voice. Not loud. Not real. Just a breath behind her ear.
“Still angry, baby?”
She didn’t answer. Just stared at the smoke curling in front of her, remembering how it once rose from the sheets when he laughed into her thighs.
That was before.
This wasn’t about remembering.
This was about replacing.
She waited for something to shift. For the ache to lessen. For the guilt to retreat.
Nothing did.
She didn’t bother closing the door behind her.
Her body felt untouched, despite everything. No ache had left her. No hunger eased.

***
The room still smelled like latex and silk and something gone when Cruz arrived. Cruz knew that smell. Knew what it meant. It clung to the walls like a confession half-whispered and never answered.
The victim was already zipped up, but the outline of his death remained. A ghost in posture, in suggestion. The silk scarf rested on a side table like a relic. The condom—tied, full—had been placed at the foot of the bed like an offering. The pegging harness lay nearby, coiled beneath a chair, straps soft and still faintly warm.
Cruz stood by the bed with her gloves on and her jaw tight, pretending her heart wasn’t racing, pretending the slick between her thighs was sweat and not something else. Her slacks clung. Her breath was shallow. She catalogued every object with too much care—every trace of the scene, every residue.
On the sill beneath the window, she spotted a partial handprint in the condensation. Smaller than the victim’s. Slender fingers. A smudge of lipstick near the knuckle.
Lipstick.
Not a fingerprint.
A brush.
Someone had paused there. Watching the street.
She didn’t say anything.
She bent down and picked up the harness. Her gloved fingers closed around the leather, but the warmth slipped through anyway. It smelled like sweat. Like lubricant. Like skin. She stared at it too long. Her mouth was dry. Her breath caught in her throat.
She dropped it into the evidence bag. Felt like she was burying a body. Her face didn’t change, but her pulse did—spiking, then sinking like a weight in water. Her stomach tightened, and for a breathless second, she thought she might be sick. Not from the scene. From how much she wanted to understand it. From how much she already did.
She didn’t speak again until the room was empty.

***
Her apartment felt sterile when she got home. Lit by dim lamps and the blue glow of nothing. The cross above her bed cast a long shadow against the wall. She stared at it like it had something to say.
Still dressed, she walked to the bathroom and turned on the shower. Her fingers shook slightly as she peeled off her jacket, then her blouse, her slacks, her panties—each layer slower than the last. Her skin burned. Her thighs ached. Her reflection was waiting.
In the mirror: parted lips, flushed cheeks, pupils dilated, a bruise on her inner thigh she didn’t remember getting.
Vivian’s scent still clung to her coat. Somehow. Lipstick and leather. Salt and something holy.
She stepped into the shower and didn’t wait. Two fingers. Immediate contact. Her back hit the tile. One hand flat against the wall, the other already between her legs. She spread herself with practiced shame.
Her breath hitched. The water was scalding.
She came fast—too fast—her orgasm crashing through her like a confession. Her thighs clenched. Her toes curled. Her mouth opened.
“Perdóname,” she whispered.
Then louder. “Perdóname, Dios mío.”
But her fingers didn’t stop.
The second one left her sobbing. Not from pain. From something deeper. From knowing this wasn’t going to end.
When it passed, she sank to her knees, letting the water beat down on her bare shoulders. Her arms wrapped around herself, not for warmth, but to keep from falling apart.
The water didn’t make her clean.
Later, lying in bed with wet hair and nothing on but the weight of what she’d seen, she stared up at the crucifix above her head. The rosary on the nightstand gleamed dully in the soft light. Crimson Psalm still haunted her lips, though she hadn’t reapplied it.
She didn’t pray.
She touched herself again.
Not out of hunger.
Out of obsession.
Out of need so deep it scraped the edges of who she thought she was.
She wasn’t chasing Vivian Vale anymore. Her jaw twitched. A bead of sweat traced down her temple. Her body clenched without asking her permission—tight and hot like prayer held too long.
She was begging to be claimed. Her breath hitched. A single tear traced a path into her hairline. She turned her face to the pillow, heart hammering, thighs still slick. Her whole body was a question now, and it had only one answer—Vivian.
She rose, unable to stay in bed, and padded barefoot back into the bathroom.
The mirror was fogged from earlier, but not enough to hide her.
She stared at herself.
Hair damp. Eyes bloodshot. A fine tremble in her jaw.
“You’re not supposed to want this,” she said softly.
Her voice didn’t sound like hers.
“She fucked him with a strap-on and kissed his throat like it was scripture.”
The mirror didn’t flinch.
“You came thinking about it.”
Her voice was steadier now.
“You didn’t pray,” she whispered. “You begged.”
She stepped closer. Her breath fogged the glass. Her fingertips hovered.
And suddenly she wasn’t here.
She was back in Ridgewood. Plastic couch. Candlelight. The smell of garlic and wax. Her mother in the other room, praying aloud to La Virgen. The crucifix above the mantle.
She was sixteen. Kneeling in the hallway after Mass. Fingers trembling between her thighs. Rosary beads in her fist. Shame riding her like heat.
She’d touched herself then, too.
And whispered, “Perdóname.”
The same way she did now.
She leaned closer to the mirror. Her breath fogged the glass again. For a second, she thought she saw Ellis there too—just behind her shoulder, not judging, not forgiving. Just watching. Like he always did when she tried to pretend she wasn't broken. She blinked, and he was gone. But the ache remained.
“If she told me to kneel…”
She didn’t finish.
She didn’t need to.
She turned off the light. Walked back toward the bed.
Tonight, she didn’t want to see a cop.
She wanted to see the woman Vivian Vale might keep.

CHAPTER 5: TOUCHED
The precinct smelled like coffee and old guilt. Phones rang. Typewriters clacked. Somewhere down the hall, a suspect cried like the building had secrets it didn’t want to keep anymore.
Detective Elena Cruz half-listened to a rookie stammer through a case update—drug bust, maybe. She nodded at the right moments, didn’t register a word. Her eyes drifted toward the doors like they were expecting a ghost.
And then she saw her.
Vivian Vale.
Walking in like she belonged there. Trench coat cinched. Heels clicking like accusations. Blonde hair curled just enough to fuck propriety sideways. She moved like she was solving a case no one knew existed. Like every step was a clue. Like the air kissed her wrists and begged for more.
Cruz’s throat closed. Her hands twitched toward her pockets, but found no comfort there.
Vivian made eye contact.
Didn’t smile.
Didn’t need to.
She walked up to the front desk, leaned in, said something too low to hear. The clerk nodded like he’d forgotten his own name. She handed him a folded slip of paper—tip, threat, prophecy. Then she turned. Walked past Cruz like Cruz wasn’t even the cop in the room.
But as she passed, she dropped something.
Cruz looked down.
A lipstick tube.
Crimson Psalm.
The same shade smeared on the first victim’s thigh like a hymn in blood.
She didn’t pick it up right away. Just stared at it—like it might confess. Like it might bloom open and whisper her name.
The hallway stretched. No one looked. No one moved.
Then, slowly, she bent down. Slipped the lipstick into her blazer pocket like it was evidence. Or a sin.
One word surfaced in her chest.
Not spoken. Not even thought. Just... breathed.
Touched.

***

That night, Cruz didn’t sleep.
She sat in the bathroom with the lights off, door locked, knees pulled to her chest on the closed toilet lid. The lipstick rested in her palm. Her other hand shook.
She stared at it like it might open on its own. Like it might hiss her secrets back at her.
It was heavier than it should’ve been. Or maybe she was.
She clicked it open.
The scent hit her first.
Not perfume. Not synthetic. Something ruinously human.
Lipstick, worn too long. Still hot with someone else’s skin. Like velvet licked clean and still warm.
It was Vivian.
Or it was her memory, rewired through scent. Sweat, smoke, something sweet rotting into sin.
The shade was rich. Deep. Like the bruise left by a mouth too reverent. Like shame that had dried on skin. Like grief that got kissed.
She twisted it higher. Brought it close.
It didn’t smell like perfume. It smelled like heat. Like sweat soaked into silk. Like a neck just kissed too long.
She pressed the tip to her fingertip. Just a dab.
Then—God help her—she touched it to her tongue.
Salt. Wax. Maybe iron. Maybe memory.
She gasped.
Pulled her hand back like she’d been burned.
The lipstick clattered into the sink.
She stared at it. Shaking. Breathing hard.
Then whispered, broken and low:
“What the fuck are you doing to me...”
Later, she stood naked in front of the mirror.
The same lipstick—now reapplied—marked a single dot at the center of her throat. A fake birthmark. A confession no one could read but her.
Her badge lay on the counter. She didn’t touch it.
She stared at herself—at the hollow under her collarbone. At the way her nipples had hardened just from memory. At the smear of sin between her thighs, invisible but felt.
And when she spoke, it wasn’t to the room.
“You didn’t even touch me.”
She said it like accusation.
Like prayer.
Like maybe she wanted to be.
Then added, softer:
“Touched.”
She reached up. Traced the lipstick with her fingertip. Dragged it down to her chest. Smudged it over her heart.
She should’ve washed it off. She didn’t.
When she stepped out of the bathroom hours later, the apartment was still and swollen with silence. Her blazer hung where she’d left it. She reached for it—absentminded, guilty—and something shifted in the inner pocket.
Another lipstick tube.
Identical.
She froze.
Not the one she’d smeared. This one was unopened. Pristine. Cold.
She hadn’t put it there.
She stared at it, pulse rising. Did Vivian carry two? Had she planted it? Had she dropped it knowing Cruz would pocket the first—then left the second like a challenge?
Or a promise?
This one felt heavier. Or maybe she did.
Her breath caught.
Was it a trap?
Or an invitation?
The lipstick pulsed in her hand—and a memory surfaced, uninvited.
Not a scream. Not a moan. A whisper—hollow and stained like a church pew too long sat upon.
She was eight. Maybe nine.
The wooden booth was darker than it needed to be, lit only by a slatted window that cast a shadow across her knees. Her shoes didn’t touch the floor. Her hands were sticky from the communion wafer. Her mouth still tasted like flour and fear.
“Bless me, Father,” she whispered, “for I have sinned.”
A creak. A cough. Then silence.
She didn’t know what to say. So she lied. Said she had taken a pencil that wasn’t hers. Said she’d hit her cousin.
But what she didn’t say was the truth.
She liked watching the altar boys light the candles. Liked how close they got to the flame. Liked when her cousin Anna kissed her cheek too long. Liked it enough to want it again.
She thought about that when the priest told her to recite Hail Marys. She thought about it when she kneeled and bit her lip and felt something she couldn’t name pulse low in her belly.
The first time she confessed, it wasn’t to God.
It was to the dark.
In bed, she lay on her back with the tube clutched between her palms like a rosary.
Somewhere inside her skull, a voice surfaced.
“You’re not dreaming about her. You’re remembering me.”
It wasn’t hers. It wasn’t Vivian’s. It tasted like Ellis—salt, breath, ghost.
She didn’t answer. She couldn’t. Not without moaning.
She didn’t open it.
Didn’t wear it.
Just held it.
And imagined Vivian’s mouth.
On her neck.
On her thighs.
On her.
She whispered a prayer she didn’t believe.
“Don’t let this ruin me.”
Then added, breath trembling:
“But if it does… make it worth it.”
The tube still smelled like her. Even cold.

CHAPTER 6: DON'T NAME IT
The apartment was too quiet. Like it hadn’t been fucked in years.
Vivian Vale lit a match with her thumbnail. The flame shivered.
She stared into it like it owed her something. Her pulse skipped. Ellis’s name almost left her mouth—but not as prayer. As proof. He lived in every heat she could no longer hold. In the spaces between her thighs where grief had nested.
The flame burned down to her fingertips before she remembered to blow it out. The scent that followed wasn’t wax or whiskey or the cheap jasmine soap she still used out of habit.
It was memory.
And memory always smelled like him.
She’d touched herself earlier. Out of habit, not hunger. The climax came quiet. Forgettable. She didn’t say his name. That was worse.
Now her fingers smelled like regret. She wiped them on a napkin. Then stared at it like it might confess something.
It wasn’t a recording. It was paper.
Beside the transcript, a manila folder. Corners worn. Lipstick prints like seals.
Inside: names. Polaroids. Handwritten notes in a looping, obsessive scrawl.
One page circled in red ink: “Roy M. – paid for silence. Casket club tie-in?”
Another: “Carrow = Falco’s fixer. Confirmed. Ellis called him ‘the concierge of consent.’”
She flipped past a blurred photograph of a man tied to a motel headboard, face half gone.
“They all touched the rot,” she thought. “I’m just cutting it out.”
Typed. Copied. Annotated.
Transcript – Interview Room 3 – Subject: Vivian Vale
She ran a fingernail down the column of questions. Not hers. Cruz’s.
“I don’t know what this is.”
Vivian smiled like someone remembering the smell of blood.
She tilted her head. Let the memory unspool.

***
Gallagher had left his desk a mess.
Typewriter ribbon half-unspooled. Vending machine coffee sweating into a Styrofoam cup. Files open like wounds. And just there, half-tucked beneath a red-tabbed folder:
TRANSCRIPT: INTERVIEW ROOM 3B – Vale, V.
Vivian was at the precinct to sign a witness statement. Something perfunctory. She’d been polite. Even smiled when Gallagher said, “Sorry to make you come back in.”
She was about to leave when she saw it.
Her name on paper.
But it wasn’t her words that stopped her. It was Cruz’s.
“I don’t know what this is.”
“Then don’t name it,” Vivian had replied.
She remembered saying it. Remembered watching Cruz’s mouth fall open like a wound.
She slipped the transcript into her coat.
Cruz passed behind her. Said nothing.
Vivian turned just enough to let the corner of the paper peek from her pocket. Just enough for Cruz to see.
“You left this lying around,” she whispered. “I thought it was meant for me.”

***
The jazz bar didn’t have a name, but Char Versa called it Sanctum.
Cruz stepped through the back of the locksmith’s shop, past a velvet curtain that smelled like cologne, cum, and unsaid things. The sound of a lonely trumpet spilled from hidden speakers—soft, wounded, like it had been crying for hours. The air was thick with smoke and sex and jazz.
Her boots sank into the carpet like it remembered other sins.
Candlelight flickered off half-empty whiskey glasses and mouths pretending not to kiss. A woman in a leather halter top moaned softly into her drink. A man in eyeliner touched his throat like it had just been bitten.
Cruz didn’t belong here.
But she wanted to.
Vivian was already there.
Red slip. No coat. Cigarette burning between two fingers like a promise. Her eyes were glossy but sharp—like she’d already undressed Cruz twice in her mind.
“Detective,” she purred, voice smooth as wet vinyl.
“I’m not here for this,” Cruz said. But it came out too soft. Too late.
Vivian smiled, slow and knowing. “Then why are you sweating?”
They sat. Not across from each other. Side by side. Legs almost touching. The silence was thick—like the air remembered who they were before they said a word.
Vivian reached into her purse and pulled out a compact mirror. Flipped it open with one hand, held it like a ritual in the other.
She reapplied her lipstick—Crimson Psalm—slow and precise, like she was painting a wound back into shape.
Cruz watched the motion. Her breath caught. Then she reached into her own coat pocket.
A twin tube.
She placed it in the center of the table, soft but deliberate.
“You dropped this,” she said. “Floor of the precinct. Same shade from three different scenes.”
Vivian’s eyes flicked to the tube, then back to Cruz.
She smiled. Not coy. Not cruel. Just seen.
“I keep spares,” she said. “But that one? That one’s sacred.”
“Is that what this is?” Cruz asked. “Sacrament by cosmetics?”
“No. It’s scripture by stain.”
Then she pushed it across the table. Her eyes never left Cruz’s.
“You should wear it,” she said.
“Why?”
“Because you already have my mouth.”
Cruz’s breath caught. Her hand trembled.
“Why me?” she asked, finally.
Vivian leaned in. Her voice dropped.
“Because you ache like someone who’s never been kissed right. And I don’t mean your mouth.”
Cruz’s jaw clenched. Her thighs pressed together.
“I don’t know what this is.”
“Then don’t name it.”
Vivian stood, stubbed the cigarette out on the rim of her glass. Held out her hand—not as an offer. As a summons.
Cruz stared at it. Then at the lipstick.
She hesitated.
Her badge. Her faith. Her whole fucking spine tried to scream.
But her legs moved.
She followed.

***
Cruz sat at the edge of the bed like a woman about to confess something she hadn’t even admitted to herself.
Vivian Vale stood just inside the door, trench coat still buttoned, red lipstick kissed away by hours of want, her blonde hair damp at the ends and curling over bare shoulders. She didn’t speak. Didn’t smile. She just watched Cruz, like she was deciding whether to devour her or save her.
“I don’t know what this is,” Cruz whispered.
Vivian tilted her head, unsmiling. “Then don’t name it.”
She unfastened the belt of her coat. It fell open.
Cruz forgot how to breathe.
Vivian wasn’t naked, but she may as well have been. Beneath the coat, a sheer red slip clung to every curve. Her full, round breasts moved beneath it, nipples dark and tight. The trim of her hips, the faint patch of blonde above her wet cunt—every detail visible, every inch a weapon.
“I wore this for you,” Vivian said.
Cruz’s voice caught. “It’s working.”
Vivian stepped between her knees and kissed her.
It started soft—a tasting, a test. Then tongues tangled, teeth grazed, and Cruz’s hands found Vivian’s waist. Her trench coat slid to the floor.
Vivian climbed into her lap, slip riding up her thighs. Cruz could feel the heat of her pussy through the thin fabric. Wet. Wanting. Dominant.
“Lie back,” Vivian said.
Cruz obeyed.
Vivian straddled her thighs, eyes locked to hers. “Can I undress you?”
A nod.
Vivian unbuttoned her shirt slowly, kissing each new inch of skin. Her lips traced Cruz’s collarbone, her sternum, the soft center of her chest. Her hands moved steady, patient.
She peeled the shirt away to reveal Cruz’s firm shoulders and small, perfect breasts—nipples dark and hard with anticipation. Cruz’s breath hitched. A rush of heat swelled in her chest, then dropped into something quieter—something shaking. She didn’t know if it was fear or reverence. But she didn’t stop it.
“Gorgeous,” Vivian whispered. She kissed them, suckled gently, made Cruz tremble.
Her hands slid down, unfastening her pants, dragging them over hips and thighs. Cruz lifted herself to help. Left in black cotton panties, she was already shaking.
“Stand up,” Vivian said.
Cruz rose.
Vivian knelt. Hooked her thumbs into the waistband. Slid the panties down, slow and reverent. They caught on her hips, then glided over her thighs. She stepped out of them.
Vivian leaned back and looked up.
Cruz was stunning.
Smooth bronze skin. Wide hips. Toned thighs. Small, high breasts. Between her legs, a neat triangle of dark hair framing a pink, glistening pussy.
Vivian stood. Took Cruz’s hand. Guided her back to the bed.
She kissed her belly first. Then her hips. Then the soft meat of her thighs.
Then Vivian kissed her pussy. A slow, wet kiss to the lips, followed by a slow drag of her tongue from bottom to top.
She circled Cruz’s clit. Sucked it into her mouth.
Cruz cried out—a sound of pleasure, disbelief, surrender.
Vivian didn’t stop. She licked and licked, circled, flicked, sucked. Held Cruz down with her arms under her thighs. Devoured her like she was starving.
Cruz came with a sharp sob. Her thighs clamped around Vivian’s head. Her voice cracked.
Vivian let her ride it out, then kissed her inner thigh. Crawled back up.
“You okay?” she whispered.
Cruz laughed, breathless. “No. Yes. Holy fuck.”
Vivian smiled. “I’m not done.”
She lifted Cruz’s hips. Parted her cheeks.
Cruz stiffened.
Vivian paused. “Do you trust me?”
Cruz nodded.
Vivian licked her asshole.
Soft. Wet. Slow.
Cruz gasped.
Vivian licked again. Deeper. Then sucked. Let her tongue swirl, tease, press. Fingers slipped back between Cruz’s legs, found her clit again.
Cruz came again, louder. Harder. Her whole body arched, spasmed, gave up.
When it passed, Vivian kissed her thigh and lay beside her.
Cruz turned. Voice shaky. “I want to taste you.”
Vivian stilled.
“I haven’t let anyone..." she started. Her voice broke. "Not since him.”
Cruz brushed hair from her face. “Then let me.”
Vivian stood. Pulled the red slip over her head.
She was devastating.
Full, soft breasts. Rosy nipples. Narrow waist. Wide hips. Thick thighs. A glistening pink cunt crowned by a soft patch of blonde.
Cruz looked up at her like a worshipper.
Vivian lay back. Opened her legs.
Cruz kissed her thighs. Her belly. Her hips. Then her pussy.
She tasted like heat and honey, slick and wild—like something Vivian had been saving for someone who deserved it.
Vivian moaned. Fingers in Cruz’s hair. Hips rising.
Cruz licked deep. Sucked her clit. Fingered her open. The first stroke of her tongue was tentative. The second was desperate. And the taste—salt, musk, sweet ruin—made her moan into Vivian’s folds like she was drinking from a grail.
Vivian’s fingers slid down, not to stop her, but to guide her. One hand on Cruz’s cheek, the other gently stroking her own nipple, moaning with each flick of tongue.
Vivian came with a scream. Loud. Raw. Her pussy convulsed, gushed, soaked Cruz’s mouth.
But Cruz didn’t stop.
She licked her again. Drove another orgasm out of her like it was owed.
Vivian sobbed. His name. Then Elena’s. Then nothing at all. Her body curled inward, as if trying to disappear into the sheets. Her mind blanked, then surged—flashes of Ellis’s blood, Cruz’s mouth, her own voice begging for silence. For a moment, she didn’t know who she was. Just a pulse. Just a moan without meaning.
After, Cruz crawled up beside her.
Vivian lay wrecked. Trembling. Her thighs still twitching. Her mouth parted like a question she didn’t know how to ask.
Cruz kissed her cheek. Soft. Present.
“I didn’t expect you,” Vivian whispered.
“Not tonight,” Cruz replied.
Vivian blinked. Her lashes were wet. Her breath finally slowing.
She didn’t pull away. She didn’t speak again.
Just curled closer. One arm draped across Cruz’s ribs like a claim she didn’t know she’d made.
The room smelled like sweat, spit, and something holy. To Cruz, it smelled like truth. Like something irreversible. She’d never been kept before. Not like this. Not quiet. Not chosen. And now, lying there, breath syncing with Vivian’s, she wondered—what if she never wanted to be let go?
And for the first time in years, Vivian Vale fell asleep in someone’s arms.
Not as a killer. Not as a ghost.
Just a woman.
Breathing.
Kept.

CHAPTER 7: THE MORNING AFTER
Elena woke like a dog kicked awake in a stranger’s bed.
The motel sheets tangled between her thighs—cold now, damp, smelling of sweat, cigarette ash, and the wet-spit edge of sex not meant to survive the morning.
For a heartbeat, she floated.
Half-dream, half-surrender.
Breathing in Vivian’s ghost.
Then the weight of the night snapped the sheet tight against her skin.
The ache between her legs.
The scratch at the back of her throat.
The memory of Vivian’s mouth—patient, brutal—mapping every shame she thought she’d locked away.
Elena didn’t move.
Stillness was all she had left.
Across the bed, Vivian Vale watched her.
Not smirking.
Not speaking.
Just watching—like a woman memorizing the last thing she knows she’s not allowed to want.
The motel hum pressed around them—flickering neon bleeding through the window blinds, the radiator clicking like teeth grinding in sleep.
Vivian’s voice broke the silence like a match snapped in gloved fingers:
“We could stay. Nobody would find us here.”
Elena’s chest tightened.
The answer tasted like iron.
“I can’t,” she said, voice too thin to be armor.
Vivian didn’t argue.
Didn’t reach for her.
The clock radio shrieked into the quiet—static, then a voice too clean to belong here:
"Mayor Falco promises crackdown on vice... sweeping arrests... restoring moral order..."
Vivian’s smile cut sideways across her mouth.
“Clock radio,” she muttered. “Some poor bastard set it to ruin our morning.”
Elena snorted before she could stop herself.
The sound hurt coming out.
She moved like the bed had already condemned her—peeling herself from the sheets, dragging the motel stink with her.
Every piece of clothing felt wrong against her skin.
The panties twisted at the waist.
The bra biting into skin still raw from worship.
She buttoned her shirt wrong, missed the seam.
Vivian’s voice ghosted over her:
“You missed a button.”
Elena fixed it without looking up.
Thumb fumbling the cheap plastic like a woman sewing herself shut.
"I know," she muttered.
A pause.
Vivian’s voice dropped, low and terrible:
"You looked beautiful last night."
Elena froze.
The laugh that tore out of her chest wasn’t human.
It was broken glass and old prayers.
“Don’t make it more than it was.”
Vivian didn’t.
Just lay there—still naked, still watching—as if she could memorize the last second Elena still belonged to her.
When Elena grabbed her coat, something small and slick tumbled out and spun across the filthy floor.
Crimson Psalm.
The lipstick clattered once against the leg of the nightstand.
A final offering.
Elena bent down, fingers clumsy, skin flushing hot against the cold.
She scooped it up and shoved it back into her pocket without a word.
Some sins don't get confessed.
They just burn under your ribs until breathing tastes like blood.
At the door, Elena hesitated.
Turned back once.
Vivian’s gaze didn’t flinch.
"Thank you," Elena said, voice cracking like a kneecap on tile.
Vivian nodded once.
No smile.
No forgiveness.
Elena stepped into the rain.
The door clicked shut behind her like a throat sealing a secret.

***

The City
The rain didn’t fall.
It punished.
It hammered her skin raw, forcing her to taste the motel on her tongue again—the sweat, the cheap soap, the coppery sweetness of betrayal.
She lit a cigarette with hands that trembled at the edges.
The first drag scorched her lungs clean.
Or tried to.
The city bled around her.
Neon ran into the gutters like sick rivers.
Steam ghosted up from the manholes—thick, hot, sour.
A payphone screamed down the block.
High and animal, ringing against the concrete like it had been calling since the world ended.
Elena didn’t move toward it.
She pressed her hand against her pocket instead—feeling the lipstick there like a loaded weapon nobody had taught her how to fire.
Not a badge.
Not a gun.
Just a smear of shame shaped like a mouth she had kissed without permission.
"You’re a cop," she whispered into the rain.
"You’re a fucking cop."
The words didn’t even sting anymore.
They just clung to her like wet wool.
She crushed the cigarette into a puddle oil-slicked with neon regret.
The payphone kept ringing.
The city didn’t care.
The city never did.
Elena walked.
Each step soaking her boots, her skin, her memory.

***

Precinct — Later That Day
The station house smelled like wet wool, rotted coffee, and lives pressed too long into polyester uniforms.
Fluorescent lights buzzed overhead like flies over a corpse nobody wanted to move.
Elena sat behind her desk, breathing shallow against the rising stink.
A stale mug of coffee sweated against her fingertips.
Gallagher slumped into the chair across from her, balancing a half-eaten doughnut like it owed him money.
"You look like a cat someone tried to drown," he said, voice bright as a razor blade.
Elena smirked out of habit, not want.
Gallagher sipped his coffee, eyes sliding sideways at her like a snake casing a broken bird.
“So," he said. "Funny thing."
Her muscles coiled.
"I went to pull that transcript from the Vale interview."
She blew smoke across the table.
Watched it writhe like something dying.
"Yeah?"
"Gone," Gallagher said, and smiled like a man sitting on a secret.
"Poof. Like your virtue."
He laughed.
Elena didn't.
Gallagher leaned back, chair creaking, the precinct sounds thinning into white noise around them.
"Janko’s hot. Wants a re-transcription. From the tape."
He shrugged, casual.
Deadly.
Elena flicked ash into the tray.
Missed.
The ash floated down onto her paperwork like black snow.
"You mind pulling the cassette?" Gallagher said, all innocence.
Standard procedure, after all.
Sure.
Sure.
Elena lit another cigarette off the last one.
Blew smoke into his smirk like a curse.
"Peachy," she said, when he asked if she was okay.
Gallagher stood up slow.
Wiped powdered sugar onto her reports.
Walked away without looking back.
But Elena felt him watching anyway.
The station air stuck to her skin like motel sweat.
And outside, the city howled under the bruised sky.

***
Elsewhere — Nightfall
Vivian Vale moved like smoke bleeding under a locked door.
The rain slicked her legs where the trench coat gapped open—bare skin humming with the city's filth, the city's prayers.
She waited across from the peepshow theater, mouth tilted into a smile nobody earned anymore.
Through the fogged glass she saw him.
Slick hair. Cheap shoes.
Left hand flashing a silver ring under the neon rot.
Falco’s men marked themselves without meaning to.
And Vivian’s hands remembered how to read those marks.
The Mob was just a shield.
Noise.
The rot lived higher.
Closer to pulpits than alleyways.
Vivian’s fingers brushed the lipstick tucked against her thigh.
Crimson Psalm.
A psalm she wrote one body at a time.
Ellis would’ve wanted blood.
He had wanted memory.
Vivian gave him both.
Tonight, another man would gasp her name too late to survive it.
Tonight, another sliver of truth would slip free, bleeding, gasping.
Vivian stepped off the curb.
Rain caught the hem of her coat like fingers.
She pushed the peepshow door open with a hand steady as worship.
The city swallowed her whole.
It always did.

CHAPTER 8: BLOOD PSALM
Midsummer. Late night. Their apartment smelled like wine, rain, and perfume. A record hissed low and sultry, spinning "Almost Blue" on vinyl.
Vivian was already barefoot by the time they got inside. She dropped her heels in the hallway and turned the lock without looking. Her lipstick was smudged, her mascara kissed the edge of her cheekbones, and she was laughing—giddy from the drinks, from dancing, from Ellis.
He was right behind her, jacket half-off, shirt unbuttoned, eyes locked on her ass like it owed him money.
"Still think I’m the best dancer in that club," he said.
She turned, arching a brow. "Baby, you stepped on a waiter’s foot during a slow song."
He shrugged. "He recovered."
They laughed, fell into each other on the couch. Her legs across his lap. His hand at the back of her neck. Wine glasses already poured and mostly ignored.
"I forgot how much I love that place," she whispered.
"It’s where I fell for you," he said.
She smiled, soft and slow. "No, this—" she leaned in, kissed him, let it linger "—this is love."
They kissed deeper. Hungrier. Her hand cupped his cheek; his slid over her thigh. They undressed each other with reverence.
Her dress slid off her shoulders like a sigh. His shirt unbuttoned slowly, her fingers grazing the skin she already knew by heart.
They kissed between each removed piece—collarbones, ribs, hips, thighs—until the only thing between them was breath.
"You always look at me like I’m a magic trick," he whispered.
Vivian grinned. "You always make me come like it’s my first time."
She pushed him down on the bed, straddled him slowly, her blonde curls tumbling over her shoulders. His cock was already hard—thick, curved slightly upward, the head flushed and slick with pre-cum.
Vivian licked her lips. "Mmm. My favorite."
She slid down his body, kissing his chest, biting his hip, then took his cock into her mouth—just the tip, her tongue teasing under the ridge.
Ellis moaned.
She slid deeper, letting the head press against the back of her throat, then pulled off with a wet pop.
"That’s not fair," he groaned.
She smirked. "You want fair? Go date someone boring."
Then she squeezed her full, soft breasts together and slid his cock between them—up and down, slow and wet, her nipples brushing the shaft with every stroke.
He gasped. "Jesus, Viv—fuck—you’re gonna make me come."
She grinned. "Not yet you’re not."
Then he grabbed her, rolled her under him, kissed her until she melted.
Her dominance gave way—willingly—to his worship.
He kissed her neck. Her breasts. Sucked her nipples one by one, biting just enough to make her moan.
"You’re perfect," he whispered, kissing down her belly.
"I know," she said. "Now shut up and eat me."
He knelt between her thighs.
Vivian’s pussy was already soaked—wet and glistening, plush lips swollen with arousal, her trimmed blonde patch soft against his cheek.
Her scent hit him—sweet and earthy, like salt and skin and something he would never get enough of.
"You smell like heaven's dirty secret," he murmured.
And he devoured her.
Tongue wide and slow, licking from her dripping entrance to her clit, then back again. He flicked her clit gently, then sucked it between his lips, moaning against her like a man starved.
Vivian writhed, her thighs pressing around his ears. "God, baby—yes—don’t stop—"
He didn’t.
He spread her wider, buried his face in her pussy like it was the most expensive meal in Manhattan.
And for him, it was.
Her taste was divine. Tangy, slick, addictive. He licked her hole, circled her clit, sucked and teased her until she was panting.
Vivian’s fingers tangled in his hair. Her other hand stroked her own nipple, hips bucking into his face. In her chest, something cracked open—not just lust, but a wave of worship and terror that she could still feel this much.
"You taste like fucking sin," he groaned. "I want to live between your legs."
"Fuck—Ellis—I’m gonna—"
Vivian’s orgasm broke over her in shudders—hips twitching, pussy clenching, her cum dripping down the crease of her ass—and in that fractured instant, she heard it.
Ellis, moaning her name.
"Viv..."
His voice, soft and helpless. A memory, a promise, a prayer.
And then—
The window shattered.
The sound was like a gunshot—followed by the rush of glass and wind and nightmare.
Ellis’s head shot up. "What the—?"
The figure came out of the shadows.
Mask. Gloves. Wire. The smell of iron and sweat.
Vivian screamed.
"ELLIS!"
Too late.
The piano wire looped around his neck. Yanked hard.
Ellis gasped, arms flailing, fingers trying to dig into the wire.
Vivian moved. Instinct. She lunged.
She grabbed for the wire, nails tearing into leather. The glove ripped free—her hand closing around bare skin.
A ring.
Thick. Gold. Oval-shaped with an intricate sigil engraved in blackened grooves—a crossbar design, like a bastardized church window. Worn wrong—on the next finger over, not the wedding one.
And then blood sprayed her face.
The wire bit deep.
His neck tore.
And with a final pull—
His head came off. The sound was wet and sudden, a thick snap that didn’t seem real until the blood came with it—flooding out in violent pulses, drenching the sheets in something irreversible.
Blood sprayed her body.
And then—
His severed head dropped into her lap.
Landing on her still-pulsing pussy.
Blood pouring over her clit.
Her own cum glistening beneath it.
His eyes were open. His mouth hung slack. His blood mixed with her pleasure. The sacred turned obscene.
Vivian stared.
Her hands moved without thinking. She touched his cheek, cupped it like she always did after sex—expecting a sigh, a smile. But now it was slack. Heavy. Wrong. The cold bled into her fingers before the shock did.
Reflex. Muscle memory. The warmth was already fading.
His headless body collapsed beside the bed.
Vivian stared—naked, soaked, stunned.
For a breathless second, she couldn’t move.
Then the killer turned toward her.
Vivian snapped.
She kicked him square in the chest. He stumbled backward.
She grabbed the bedside lamp—ceramic, heavy, brutal—and smashed it into his face.
Glass. Blood. Screaming.
She shoved past him—covered in cum and blood, barefoot, naked, sobbing.
She ran.
Down the stairs.
Bare feet slipping. Blood and rain. The city swallowing her.
Into the night.
Into the storm.
Into the hunger that would never end.

***
Vivian stood alone now, dripping rain and memory onto cracked pavement. Shaking.
She stared at her own hands—blood under her nails, a ghost between her fingers.
The ring.
She could still see it. Heavy. Gold. Marked like a secret no one was supposed to know.
Not a wedding ring.
Not an accident.
An answer.
The final breath of doubt left her.
It wasn't just a hunch. It was truth. Branded into her memory as surely as blood stained her thighs.
The man who wore that ring had killed Ellis Monroe.
And Vivian Vale—
was going to make him remember it.
With his last fucking breath.

CHAPTER 9: RESURRECTION LICK
The rain slicked her hair to her face, dripped down her thighs like secondhand sweat. Vivian Vale walked barefoot through the alleys, heels in one hand, the other curled into a fist inside the pocket of her coat.
She wasn’t hunting anymore. Not tonight.
Tonight, the city could bleed without her.
The church rose out of the mist like a broken tooth. Iglesia del Silencio.
She had found it the week Ellis died—drunk on grief and cheap bourbon, bloodied at the knees from a fall she couldn’t remember. The church had been boarded up then, left to rot. She liked it that way. No prayers. No saints. No forgiveness. Only wax puddles, cracked pews, and the Virgin’s robe slashed open at the heart.
She’d come here before. To sit. To light a match and watch it gutter in her hand. To whisper Ellis’s name into the splinters. To think about how easy it would be to disappear.
But she had never touched herself here.
Not until tonight.
The door yawned open on its ruined hinges. She slipped inside, the wet stone kissing her bare feet. The altar waited at the far end, crooked and wax-stained, crowned by a crucifix cracked through the Virgin’s eyes. Someone had scrawled across her robe in lipstick:
TOUCHED.
Vivian walked the aisle like a woman walking into her own funeral.
She reached the altar and knelt.
Not to pray.
To fuck.
She spread her coat beneath her, the slip clinging damp to her thighs. No panties. Just silk against skin, shivering. Her cunt was already wet—from the rain, from memory, from the ache that never left her.
From inside the coat, she pulled something small and stoppered—a glass vial, sealed with wax. It had sat heavy in her pocket for weeks, a weight she hadn't dared name.
The sight of it made her chest ache.
She twisted the wax-sealed stopper free.
The scent hit her first—old iron, musk, the ghost of a man’s final breath.
She didn’t remember grabbing the vial that night. Only stumbling to her vanity, hands slick with blood and cum and grief, pouring what was left of him—of them—into a bottle meant for perfume.
She hadn’t known why.
She still didn’t.
She tipped it over her chest.
The contents—thick, dark, ruined—fell onto her skin, soaked into the slip at her sternum. The cloth between her breasts caught it like an offering.
Her nipples hardened beneath it. Her breath broke.
She lay back.
Spread her thighs.
Touched herself.
Slow. Wet. Intentional. Like building her own altar out of breath and ruin.
Her free hand lifted the bloodied cloth to her mouth. She sucked it—held it there like it was his cock, his tongue, his voice.
"Ellis," she gasped against it.
Her fingers slid deep. Her palm crushed her clit. Her body bowed off the stone floor, slip riding up her hips. The rain outside roared like a congregation.
"I'm still yours," she whispered into the cloth. "I'm still—"
She squeezed her throat with the hand that wasn't fucking herself—tight, brutal, almost begging for a wire to close the loop. Blood smeared across her lips, staining the prayer she couldn't finish.
The orgasm hit like a scream swallowed by the storm—tight, involuntary, brutal.
She came hard.
Twice.
The second one tore through her like his death all over again—legs shaking, cunt slick, chest heaving against the wet silk and blood. She sobbed into the slip, body convulsing like resurrection tried and failed.
When it passed, she collapsed.
The blood soaked into her skin.
She smiled, broken and wet.
"Resurrected," she whispered.
Not him.
Herself.
For now.

***
The church breathed wax and rot around her.
The cracked crucifix wept rainwater onto the altar.
Vivian lay there, undone, her breath soft, her thighs trembling, her cunt still aching around absence.
And somewhere, unbidden—
Cruz's face rose in her mind.
The way Elena had looked at her. Like she wasn't just a monster. Like she was something holy.
Vivian clutched the cloth to her chest.
You were supposed to use her.
The plan had been simple.
Seduce the cop. Blind her with orgasm and lipstick and lies. Make her doubt. Make her beg.
Not love her.
Not want.
Not ache like this.
She swallowed hard, the taste of blood and grief bitter on her tongue.
She wanted—
God help her, she wanted to kiss Elena without cruelty.
She wanted to be touched the way Cruz touched her—as if she mattered. As if the blood on her hands could be forgiven by fingers trailing soft down her spine.
She wanted a night without knives.
Vivian felt her throat tighten.
You can't have both, the voice inside her hissed. You chose blood. You chose death.
Snap out of it.
She shoved the memory down. Locked it behind the old walls.
She was here for Ellis.
She would die for Ellis.
Not for a woman who made her believe she could still be saved.
Vivian sat up slowly. The slip clung damp to her chest, a faint dark stain blooming at her sternum, like bruised silk.
She buttoned the coat over it, hands steady, breath not.
Then she walked barefoot into the rain.
Outside, the city bled neon into puddles.
Inside, her heart forgot how not to want.
She didn’t look back.

CHAPTER 10: SAFE FOR THE FIRST TIME
The night had teeth.
Cruz sat on the edge of her bed, still in her slacks and sweat-stained blouse, the rotary phone receiver dangling between her fingers. Gallagher's words were still humming in her skull like a siren wound too tight.
"I’ll be reviewing that tape first thing tomorrow, Cruz."
The click of the line going dead had felt like a verdict.
She lit a cigarette with shaking fingers, sucked smoke into her lungs until her chest ached. The window was cracked just enough to let the city's breath seep in—wet asphalt, old cigarette butts, something sour under the rain.
Every muscle in her body was a confession she couldn't speak.
She thought of Vivian.
The way she looked at her—not like a cop. Not like a woman. Like something sacred and breakable. Like something she already owned.
Cruz closed her eyes, cigarette trembling between her fingers.
She could lose everything.
The badge. Her career. Her family's brittle pride.
But the silence in her apartment tasted worse. Tasted like failure. Like a body cooling under motel sheets.
She stubbed the cigarette out against the windowsill, grabbed the phone, and dialed.
The payphone outside the bar two blocks down answered with a mechanical whine. Cheap jazz spilled from the doorway behind her, but the line hissed like a secret.
It rang once.
Twice.
"Vale."
Vivian's voice—hoarse velvet, already breathing into her like smoke.
Cruz swallowed.
"It's me," she said. "I… I needed—"
She didn't finish. Couldn't.
Vivian was silent for a beat. Then:
"You shouldn't be calling me."
"I know."
Another beat.
"Are you alone?"
"Yeah."
The rain whispered against the awning overhead. Cruz shifted, rainwater leaking through the cracked phone booth ceiling, dripping onto her shoulder.
She heard Vivian breathe out. A soft, broken thing.
"I can't stop thinking about you," Cruz said, voice raw.
There was a sharp inhale on the other end—like a wound reopening.
"Good," Vivian whispered. "Because I can't stop thinking about you either."
The city groaned around them—sirens, wet tires, distant jazz—but the line held steady. A lifeline made of filth and fear and need.
"Where are you?" Vivian asked, low and dangerous.
"A payphone. Outside..." She glanced back at the bar sign—peeling paint, neon bleeding down the brick. "O'Hara's."
"Wait there."
Click.
Gone.
Cruz stared at the dead receiver, heart punching her ribs. She hung it up, wiped her palms on her thighs. Waited.
But a thought slipped under her ribs—hot, urgent, embarrassing.
She hadn't showered.
The realization hit her all at once. The sweat still clinging to her skin. The taste of cheap cigarettes on her breath. And worse—the memory of Vivian rimming her. Vivian's mouth—slow, reverent—pressing against the part of her that had never been touched before, let alone kissed like gospel.
Cruz shivered.
That moment had cracked her open. Not just the pleasure—the shame. The tenderness. The way she'd sobbed into motel pillows without meaning to, the way she'd been remade with every flick of Vivian's tongue.
She needed to be clean. Needed to be ready. Just in case.
Not because she expected it—she told herself—but because if it happened again, if Vivian touched her like that again, she wanted to be worthy of it.
She darted back to her apartment, stripped in the hallway, and stepped into the shower before the water had even warmed.
The water hit her cold, then scalding. She scrubbed herself raw—between her legs, between her cheeks, everywhere Vivian might kiss, might claim.
Not vanity. Not fear.
Devotion.
By the time she was back outside, hair still damp, jeans clinging to clean skin, she was trembling. Not from the cold.
From want.
Five minutes. Ten.
Then—
A black coat bleeding out of the night.
Vivian.
Hair damp, lashes clumped from the rain, red lipstick smeared like a prayer she'd already half-forgotten. She moved like a slow sin, hips swaying under the trench coat, eyes locked on Cruz like she might eat her whole.
She didn't speak.
She just walked up, pressed one gloved hand to Cruz's chest—right over the badge hidden beneath—and pushed.
Cruz stumbled back into the phone booth.
Vivian followed.
Rain slicked the space between them, but their bodies erased it in a breath. Vivian's mouth hovered a fraction from hers.
"You sure?" she rasped.
Cruz nodded.
Vivian kissed her.
It wasn't soft. It wasn't slow.
It was teeth and tongue and the kind of hunger that tore stitches open.
Cruz whimpered into it, her hands finding Vivian's waist, clutching the wet fabric like it could save her. Like it could drown her cleaner.
The kiss broke with a gasp.
"Come with me," Vivian said.
And Cruz did.
They ran through the rain—no umbrellas, no apologies—to Vivian's apartment. A third-floor walk-up that smelled like wet brick and forgotten prayers. Jazz bled from the window next door. The hallway tasted like old cigarette smoke and somebody else's regret.
Inside, the bedroom was dim, the bed a mess of black sheets and tangled promises.
Vivian stripped Cruz with her eyes first. Then her hands.
She pushed the blouse off Cruz's shoulders, unzipped the slacks, let them fall. Cruz stood trembling in plain black underwear, nipples hard from the cold, from the want.
Vivian shed her coat. She wore only a slip—black, clingy, almost obscene in its simplicity.
She reached for Cruz. Pulled her to the bed.
***
The city was humming beneath the open window—horns low in the distance, the occasional bark of a dog, the wet shimmer of tires on pavement. But inside Elena Cruz’s bedroom, everything had gone still.
Vivian Vale straddled her.
Bare legs against warm skin, her slip hiked up, the soft black fabric bunched around her waist. Elena was beneath her, hair haloed across the pillow, chest bare, sweat pooling in the small of her throat. The room smelled like sex and summer—like breath and salt and something about to shift.
Elena’s hands cupped Vivian’s hips, not possessive, not demanding—steady. Grounded. Her thumbs moved in small circles over the skin there, reverent, like she didn’t want to guide Vivian’s rhythm, just witness it.
Vivian rocked her hips forward, grinding against Elena’s thigh. The slick heat between her legs left no mystery about what she needed—what she was chasing. And yet, her body held tension like a live wire. Each thrust forward was met with hesitation, the echo of something old, something bleeding.
She didn’t let herself close her eyes.
Because if she did, she might see him.
Ellis.
The final breath. The collapse. The way his head hit her thighs the moment she came. That night was etched into her nervous system like a death rattle. Every climax since had been a curse—blood-soaked, involuntary, wrong.
But Elena didn’t know any of that.
She just held her.
Beneath her, Elena breathed steady. Her eyes never left Vivian’s face. She didn’t ask for more. Didn’t push. Just existed—bare, open, safe. Her thigh rose slightly, pressing more firmly against Vivian’s cunt. The contact dragged a moan from Vivian’s throat—low, surprised, almost ashamed.
She bit her lip.
“Don’t stop,” Elena whispered, barely audible. “You can let go.”
Vivian didn’t know if she believed that. But she wanted to. So she moved—slow at first, hips grinding down, her clit dragging against Elena’s thigh, the friction maddening in its precision. Her hands braced on Elena’s ribs. Her breath started to stutter.
And then it hit.
Not sharp. Not violent. Soft.
A wave.
Pleasure rolled through her like warm water. Her spine arched. Her mouth fell open. She gasped.
“Oh my god,” she choked out.
Her thighs trembled, body locking in place, then shaking loose. There were no flashbacks. No Ellis. Just Elena’s body beneath her and the sound of her name still echoing off the walls.
Her orgasm crested, crashed, and left her empty—but not broken. Just quiet.
She collapsed forward, forehead resting against Elena’s collarbone, breath ragged.
For a long moment, neither of them moved.
Elena reached up and stroked her back. “I’ve got you,” she said. No ceremony. No pity. Just truth.
Vivian let herself be held.
Her chest ached—not with grief, but with the unbearable weight of relief. Her body was still humming, but this time, it wasn’t with fear. Just sensation. Just her.
“I didn’t see him,” she whispered, almost to herself.
Elena didn’t answer right away.
Then, soft: “Who?”
Vivian’s eyes burned. “Ellis. I always see him when I come. His face. His blood.” Her throat tightened. “But not this time.”
Elena pulled her closer. Not to fix her. Not to fill the silence. Just to be there.
They lay like that for a while. A tangle of sweat and tenderness, the kind that made time feel like it bent around them.
Eventually, Vivian stirred. She pushed herself up, kissed the edge of Elena’s jaw, and murmured, “I need a minute.”
Elena nodded, letting her go with a final squeeze to her hand.
Vivian padded barefoot to the bathroom, not bothering to pull her slip back down. Her thighs were still slick. Her skin flushed. Her reflection was waiting.
The light buzzed on.
She froze.
There she was. Hair wild, lips kissed raw, eyeliner smudged to hell. A bruise on her shoulder she didn’t remember getting. The blood was gone. The scream was gone. And in her eyes?
Stillness.
She leaned over the sink, staring hard.
“You didn’t show up,” she whispered to the ghost that wasn’t there.
The mirror didn’t answer.
She turned off the light.
When she walked back into the bedroom, the stillness followed her—held close, like a secret she hadn’t decided whether to share. Elena Cruz was still there, waiting. Watching. The sheet curled around her like armor she hadn’t decided to drop.
Vivian didn’t speak.
She just stood in the doorway a second too long. Then walked back. Slipped into bed. Took Elena’s hand like it was the most natural thing in the world.
And said nothing.
The silence stretched, heavy but tender. Rain smudged the outside world into watercolor shadows against the window.
Elena swallowed hard. Her voice was a rasp in the dark.
"Gallagher's gonna listen to the tape."
Vivian didn't move, just let her thumb trace slow, almost reverent circles over the back of Cruz's hand.
"The interrogation?" Vivian finally asked, soft.
"Yeah. Said he'd review it first thing."
The words tasted like rust in Cruz's mouth. Fear curled tight around her ribs. Not just fear of getting caught—fear of what she'd already given up without even being asked.
Vivian turned her head, forehead brushing Cruz's temple. "Let him."
"You don't get it," Cruz whispered. "This badge—I fought for it. Crawled over men who wanted me to fail. Laughed it off when they called me..." She couldn't even say it.
"Dyke?"
Cruz flinched. Not at the word. At how easily Vivian said it, like stripping off a wet coat.
"I can't lose it," Cruz said. "Not like this."
Vivian was quiet for a long moment.
"You're not going to lose anything that matters," she said. "Not tonight."
Cruz stared at the ceiling, heart pounding. The unspoken truth buzzed between them like neon—thick, aching.
She knew.
Vivian knew she knew.
Neither of them said it.
Vivian shifted closer, slipping a thigh between Cruz's legs, pressing the length of her body against hers.
"You were never just a cop," Vivian murmured against her skin. "You were always more than that."
Cruz closed her eyes. Breathed her in—lipstick, sweat, rain.
"This doesn't end well," Cruz whispered.
Vivian kissed her shoulder. A benediction. A dare.
"Then let's make it worth ending for."
Cruz turned into her without thinking, tangled their legs together. She clung to Vivian like she was the only thing tethering her to the ground.
Outside, the city kept humming—wet and ruthless and alive.
Inside, Cruz let go.
Not of her badge.
Not of her fear.
Of the lie that she was still trying to survive without her.
Only this.
Only her.
CHAPTER 11: THE WOMAN SHE'S CHASING
The motel room was soaked in the kind of heat that didn’t come from the radiator. The kind that clung to curtains and skin. The kind that made the air taste like breath and regret.
Vivian Vale straddled the man on the bed, her thighs slick and trembling, her hands pressed flat against his chest. His name didn’t matter. His cock was thick and curved—too close to Ellis's to be ignored.
She hated that.
But she was riding him anyway. Slow. Grinding. Her slip shoved up to her waist, her breasts bouncing with each motion, sweat streaking the valley between them.
He groaned beneath her, hands clutching her hips like he thought they belonged to him.
"God, baby—fuck—you feel like heaven—"
Vivian's voice stayed low, distant. "Then pray harder."
She fucked him harder. The sound of their bodies slapped the walls—wet, obscene. Her cunt was soaked, his cock disappearing and reappearing like a ritual. Her thighs trembled. Her hair clung to her face. The moment teetered.
She almost felt.
Almost.
Then it happened.
She squirted.
Hard.
Her whole body locked, then let go—a hot, wet pulse gushing from her cunt, splashing his stomach, her thighs, the sheets. She gasped—more from shock than pleasure—and froze.
The man moaned. Smiled up at her, stupid and eager. "Holy shit. Fuck, do it again—"
She looked down at him.
For half a second, she saw another face—Ellis, mouth open, blood misting the air. The memory slammed into her gut like a car crash.
Her breath hitched.
The knife was already under the pillow.
It always was.
Her hand slipped beneath it.
He saw the glint. Opened his mouth.
She slit his throat in one clean, furious arc.
The blood came fast. Hot. Arterial. It sprayed across her chest, streaking the squirt still glistening on her skin. Her thighs trembled again. Her cunt clenched around his dying cock.
He twitched.
She came again.
Harder.
Silent, violent, holy.
When it passed, she didn't move at first.
She sat astride his hips, trembling, the knife still slick in her hand, blood bubbling from the raw seam in his throat. His cock twitched once inside the cradle of her thighs, a dying reflex. She could feel his life leaking out against her skin—warm, obscene, necessary.
The motel window rattled again. Rain pushing harder now. The stink of iron, sex, wet carpet, and cheap detergent thickened the room until it tasted like regret.
Vivian blinked.
For a moment—a terrible, aching moment—she saw Ellis.
Not the way he'd died.
The way he'd looked after.
Soft. Slack. Beautiful in ruin.
Her fingers moved before she could stop them. She brushed the man's cheek—light, almost reverent—feeling the heat already starting to lift from his skin. His eyes were glassy, mouth ajar, an unfinished plea.
She flinched back like she'd been burned.
No tenderness. No fucking tenderness.
The squirt between her thighs was cooling now, tacky against her skin. Blood streaked her slip, her belly, the insides of her trembling thighs. Her hair stuck to her throat. Every breath felt like it was pushing broken glass through her lungs.
The void opened up inside her, hungry and wide.
It almost swallowed her whole.
Instead, she wiped her hand slowly, deliberately, across her chest—smearing blood into her skin like perfume, like warpaint, like something holy she didn't deserve.
The man's body gave one final twitch beneath her.
Vivian tilted her head.
"Almost," she whispered. Her voice cracked. "You almost got spared."
She laughed then—sharp, hollow, splintering through the room like a gunshot that nobody answered.
She staggered off the bed. Her bare feet slapped wet onto the carpet.
Her slip clung to her hips like second skin.
The blood, the squirt, the sweat all dragged at her as she pulled her trench coat on, not bothering to wipe herself clean.
The knife slid back into the lining like it belonged there.
She glanced once more at the body.
Something shimmered on the nightstand, catching the motel’s flickering neon through the half-shut blinds.
A cigarette case.
Silver. Ornate. Too nice for this dump.
Vivian smiled faintly, a private joke between herself and the grave.
She lifted it, snapped it open. Inside, tucked neatly between crumpled cigarettes and a matchbook, was a business card.
Not just any card—one she recognized.
The embossed seal of The Pyramid Rose.
A jazz bar.
A haunt.
A place where Ellis once kissed her behind a velvet curtain while Chet Baker moaned overhead.
A place tied to the mayor's men.
Vivian’s fingers tightened around it.
A new lead. A new confession waiting to be carved.
As she slid the card into her coat, her eyes caught another glint.
His right hand.
A ring. Not a wedding band. Heavier. Thicker. Stamped with an insignia she’d seen before—on another man she’d bled.
The same twisted brotherhood.
Rage and sorrow twisted low in her gut.
This wasn’t random. This was ritual. This was rot.
For a heartbeat, she considered taking the ring. Slipping it free. Tucking it into her pocket like a relic.
But no.
Better to leave it.
Better to let Cruz find it.
Another breadcrumb. Another confession waiting to be swallowed.
She straightened, the card burning a hole in her coat, the storm clawing at the window.
And left.
The rain greeted her like a slap. Cold. Relentless. Alive.
She welcomed it.
It reminded her she still could bleed—even if nothing inside her ever wanted to heal.

***
By the time Cruz arrived, the scene was already crawling.
Beat cops loitered outside, leaning against patrol cars, smoking, trading jokes.
"Looks like he went out with a bang," one said, flipping his notebook closed.
His partner chuckled, lighting a cigarette under the sagging awning. "Shit, if I gotta go, let it be with a woman half as wild as that."
They laughed, the sound bouncing off the wet concrete, hollow as a drum.
Cruz didn’t laugh. She barely breathed.
She ducked under the yellow tape. The rain had turned the pavement slick, reflections of neon blinking like dying stars across the puddles.
The motel manager hovered nearby, reeking of wet wool and cheap gin. Someone had already vomited in the stairwell. A wet trail of footprints led up the cracked stairs.
Cruz stepped inside.
The smell hit her harder than the heat.
Metal. Sweat. Sex. Death.
A humid confession clinging to the walls.
The man was naked. Throat gaping. Blood pooled around his shoulders like a red collar. The sheets were soaked. The stink of it—heat, cum, wet cotton—choked the room.
But what caught her breath—
Was the silk scarf.
Half-tucked beneath the pillow.
Soaked.
Not just in blood.
In squirt.
Her pulse kicked.
She knelt, gloved, careful. Bagged it—standard procedure—her hands trembling slightly as she zipped it into plastic.
She tucked the bagged scarf into the inside pocket of her coat, feeling the weight of it against her ribs like a hidden prayer. Hot. Wrong. Alive.
Footsteps behind her.
A beat cop leaned into the room. "You find anything good, Detective?"
Cruz froze.
Too long.
"Nothing that'll help," she said, voice tight.
The cop shrugged, chewing his gum like a cow in a slaughterhouse, and wandered off.
Cruz exhaled slowly, the scarf burning a hole in her pocket even inside the bag.
She turned—just as Gallagher finally stepped in, rain clinging to the shoulders of his jacket, cigarette dangling from his mouth.
"You always get the fun ones, Cruz," he said around the smoke, eyeing the room with a grimace.
She shrugged, trying to look like her insides weren’t clawing their way out.
Gallagher squinted at her. "You look like you need a drink. Or a goddamn exorcism."
He crouched by the body, squinting at the blood patterns.
"By the way," he added casually, flicking ash toward the door. "Finally gave that tape a listen."
Cruz stiffened.
"The Vale interview," Gallagher said, voice loose but watching. "You ever notice how she steers the conversation? You think you’re leading, but it’s her hand on your back."
He exhaled a long, lazy drag toward the broken ceiling fan.
"Weird broad," he added, almost like an afterthought.
But his eyes stayed on her a beat too long.
Cruz swallowed hard. Forced her body into motion. Pretended to jot notes on the blood pattern even as the scarf’s scent—salt, musk, something floral and sharp—wrapped itself around her breath.
Gallagher said nothing else.
But Cruz knew.
He was watching her. He was waiting.
And somewhere, deep in her gut, she knew she was already bleeding.

***
Later that night, she lay in bed.
The scarf on her pillow.
Still damp through the bag.
She should’ve left it in evidence.
She should’ve burned it.
She didn’t.
She unzipped the bag. Pulled it out. Brought it to her face.
The scent hit her like confession.
She didn’t pray.
She didn’t speak.
She just touched herself.
Slow. Careful.
One hand pressing the silk against her mouth. The other sliding down between her legs.
The wetness there wasn’t fear.
It was want.
It was worship.
She rocked her hips against her hand, muffling her whimpers against the scarf. The fabric clung to her lips, her breath hitching, her thighs shaking.
Images crashed behind her eyes—
Vivian Vale, straddling the dead man.
Blood splashing her breasts.
Mouth open.
Eyes wild.
Moaning.
Cruz came with a sob, muffled and messy, clenching the scarf so hard it left fabric burns on her fingers.
Her body twitched like a broken thing.
Sweat pooled between her breasts. Her thighs stuck to the sheets, slick with need and shame.
When she pulled the scarf away, it left a ghost of itself across her cheek—a faint, raw imprint that would darken by morning.
She lay there, gasping, body wrecked, chest rising like a prayer she didn’t dare speak aloud.
Hail Mary, full of grace, she thought bitterly. Blessed art thou among sinners like me.
Forgive me, she thought.
But the room stayed silent.
Only the rain answered, tapping against the window like a priest too tired to knock.
She didn’t want to catch her anymore.
She wanted to be caught.
She wanted to be the next relic Vivian left behind.
And somewhere deep, in the place prayer used to live, Elena Cruz moaned Vivian Vale’s name into the dark and didn’t ask for forgiveness.

CHAPTER 12: FALCO'S SMILE
The walls were velvet. Deep burgundy. The kind of color that swallowed light and secrets. Somewhere downstairs, jazz and coke-disco bled through a gold-trimmed stereo system. Ice clinked in cut crystal. The party murmured like a slow-moving beast.
Upstairs, in the real room—the one with no cameras, no servants, no wives—Mayor Dominic Falco was on all fours.
Naked.
Hairy.
Sweat-drenched.
He grunted into the cunt of a woman named Simone—one of three in the room—all professionals, all paid, all high as goddamn satellites. Her thighs hugged his face like a crown. Her full 70s bush glistened with spit and sweat. She was moaning, but her eyes were elsewhere—fixed on the third woman, Cassandra, who was currently strapped up and pounding the mayor’s ass with brutal rhythm.
The harness squeaked against her hips. She grinned like a predator.
"You like that, Dominic?" she purred. "You like being fucked like a back-alley dog?"
He tried to groan something—mouth full of Simone’s cunt—but all that came out was wet noise and desperation.
The second woman, Lola, was bent over in front of him, one leg up on a padded chair. He’d been fucking her minutes ago, sweat dripping off his chest hair into the curve of her back, before he begged for the other hole to be filled.
And of course, Cassandra obliged. She always did.
There was cocaine dust on the antique mirror table near the bed—three thick lines already gone. Their noses were raw. Their teeth grinding. The air itself tasted like cum and powder.
Lola reached back, tugging the mayor’s thinning hair. "You wanted morality, Mr. Mayor?" she hissed. "You wanted purity?"
He grunted into Simone’s pussy. Cassandra slammed in deeper. Lola smeared her own cum on his back.
This was his real campaign. Not in city hall. Not on the news. Here. In this locked room, between three women who knew exactly what he liked and exactly how much he paid to make it happen.
He started to come—grunting, twitching, his cock leaking into the sweat-soaked sheets.
Cassandra didn’t stop. Simone grabbed his face and made him stay. Lola laughed. "Don’t you fucking finish until she’s done with your hole."
He choked, gasped, bit down hard on Simone’s thigh. Blood bloomed beneath his teeth.
"Fuck, fuck," he moaned, voice wrecked. "Harder—don’t stop—"
Cassandra gave him three more brutal thrusts and then pulled out with a slick, wet snap. The mayor collapsed, twitching, cum pooling beneath him. His asshole raw, spit trailing from his lips. He looked like a hunted animal, post-fuck and post-truth.
Simone slapped his face lightly. "Smile for your legacy, sweetheart."
He grinned.
Blood in his mouth. Coke in his nose. Cum in the sheets.
Somewhere inside, he still thought this was penance. That every whimper bought him another week of pretending he was clean.
And not a single camera in the room.

***
The press conference smelled like cologne, sweat, and denial.
Mayor Dominic Falco stood at the podium in a crisp three-piece suit. Navy. Subtle pinstripe. The tie a tasteful red. His hair was combed back, slick with product and denial.
Grease glistened in the part of his hair, and the pancake makeup caked into the cracks around his temples, crumbling under the heat like dried confessions. Not a trace of last night’s depravity lingered—except in the hollowness behind his eyes.
The cameras clicked like locusts.
He cleared his throat. Stepped into the light.
"This city is sick," he said, voice steady, fatherly. "And I intend to cure it."
Behind him, the city seal gleamed like a halo. Reporters sat in tight rows. Flashbulbs popped.
The air buzzed with the stink of burnt coffee, stale sweat, and cigarette smoke crushed under camera bags. The fluorescents overhead flickered like dying halos, spitting light across the sweat-slick faces below.
"We are at war with vice," he continued. "With pornography. With prostitution. With the perversion of our youth and the moral decay that threatens every corner of New York."
Cameras zoomed. Pens scratched.
He smiled, teeth sharp and white. Practiced.
"My administration has already begun cleansing the streets. Massage parlors will be shut down. Peep shows will be replaced with family-owned businesses. Crackdowns are coming. Morality is not optional. It’s our only chance."
Applause. Or was it just the echo of camera shutters?
"The soul of this city is not for sale," he said.
Not for everyone, anyway.
Because in the rooms behind closed doors? In his mansion on the edge of the city? The soul of New York was for sale.
But only if you were rich enough to buy it. Only if you could afford women like Simone, Cassandra, and Lola. Only if you could come with a mouth full of pussy and coke and still wear a crucifix the next morning.
He looked down at his notes. Then directly into the cameras.
"We’re going to clean this city up," he said. "And anyone who stands in the way… will be removed."
He stepped back.
Smiling.
Holy.
Covered in last night’s sin beneath the starch of his shirt.

***

Cruz watched from the back row, arms crossed, stomach a taut knot she couldn’t name.
Above it all, a cracked wall speaker coughed out bursts of static from the city seal announcement. The broken fluorescents hummed like rotten teeth gnashing against the marble.
Across the room, Vivian Vale stood near a marble column, hidden behind wide dark sunglasses and a loosely draped shawl. Silent. Still. A specter in satin.
When Falco stepped away from the podium, he moved down the aisle—brushing so close to Vivian she could feel the stale heat of his body as it passed.
The smell hit her.
Sharp. Chemical. Masculine.
Sweat bloomed under the silk shawl. Her pulse stuttered against her throat. But her face stayed still.
The same fucking cologne.
The same scent she'd noticed on every man she had killed.
Vivian’s breath stuttered in her chest. Under the sunglasses, her eyes burned. Memory stabbed her vision:
●	Ellis’s head falling into her lap.
●	Blood spraying her thighs, her cunt, her chest.
●	The masked killer’s breath hot behind his steel-and-cologne mask.
●	The glint of a ring on a glove-slicked hand.
Falco’s hand brushed close.
Vivian glanced down—past the cuff of his suit jacket—and saw it.
The smell. The ring. The memory.
And something else.
The cigarette case. Tucked in the bottom drawer of her apartment, wrapped in one of the silk scarves she'd used to bind men to motel beds. Scarves that smelled of sweat, surrender, and prayers no god had answered.
She hadn’t thought it mattered.
Now, the memory of its brushed metal surface burned behind her closed eyes.
She needed to go back.
Needed to trace the symbols with her fingertips. Needed to breathe it in, close enough to catch the scent she hadn’t known she was hunting until now.
Because the map wasn’t just painted in blood and come. It was etched in gold. And she was finally ready to read it.
A ring. Not on the wedding finger. Thick gold, etched with a symbol she couldn’t fully make out.
Her throat closed.
This was it. The final piece she hadn’t let herself see.
She didn’t know the full truth yet. Not how they were all connected. Not why the scent tied them. But she knew enough.
Falco was part of it. The blood on her thighs wasn’t random. It had always been a map.
Across the room, Cruz saw it.
Just a flicker.
A tightening in Vivian’s jaw. A stillness too taut. A breath held just a second too long.
No one else noticed.
But Cruz did.
Because she knew Vivian Vale’s body now.
Falco brushed past.
Oblivious. Drunk on his own false salvation.
Vivian stood frozen for one more breath.
Then whispered, so quiet the shawl caught it like smoke:
"Soon."

***

The door shut with a heavy thud. Soundproof. The kind of quiet that made secrets echo.
Dominic Falco loosened his tie with one hand and exhaled slow, like the speech had been foreplay and now he was coming down from it. The driver didn’t speak. Knew better. Knew his job was forward motion and silence.
The car slipped into traffic, and the mayor leaned back against the leather, letting his head rest on the cool window.
He looked immaculate.
Suit crisp. Tie tight. Hair precise.
But under his collar, sweat had started to bloom again. Not from nerves—from memory.
He reached into the inside pocket of his jacket. Pulled out a small manila envelope.
Inside: a single Polaroid. Fresh.
Three women. One strap-on. One bloody thigh. One open mouth with a tongue extended like a communion plate.
His own face was in the center. Bent. Feral. Worshipping.
He stared at it for a long moment.
Then—without shame, without hesitation—he brought the photo to his nose and inhaled.
Deep.
Slow.
Filthy.
A smile twitched at the corner of his mouth.
Then he slipped two fingers into his mouth. Sucked them clean. They tasted faintly of latex and last night’s perfume. He let them drag down across his chin, like an afterthought.
"Praise be," he muttered to no one.
He folded the photo and tucked it into the breast pocket of his shirt—close to his heart.
The car kept moving.
Outside, the city roared on—unaware that its so-called savior was stroking his ego with the scent of last night’s sin and smiling like salvation was something you could buy by the hour.

CHAPTER 13: THE BLOODY COMMUNION
The rain stuttered against the windows like broken prayer beads. Vivian Vale sat in the cracked leather armchair of her apartment, a cigarette burning slow between two bloodless fingers. The record player whispered a tired jazz lament, something scratchy and broken — a memory on vinyl.
She wore only a black slip, sweat-slick, clinging to her thighs, hungry for touch. Her trench coat hung like a crucified ghost by the door.
On her lap: the cigarette case. Silver. Monogrammed with a single F.
She turned it over once, twice, the metal catching the sick glow of the neon that bled in from the street below. Her fingers were steady now. The shakes had passed. Ritual always steadied her.
Vivian snapped it open.
Inside, the slim black card waited.
Embossed in dark red:
Velvet Hand Club. 13th Street. Members Only.
She traced the letters like they were Ellis’s last breath.
"Velvet Hand," she murmured, exhaling smoke that coiled like a curse.
She stood. Crossed the small room, every step a decision. The walls peeled like old scabs. The air smelled like rain and memory.
At her dresser, she pulled open the top drawer.
Crimson Psalm lipstick. Her blade. A Polaroid of Ellis she never let herself look at too long.
She reapplied her lipstick slowly, staring into the cracked mirror. Painted her mouth like a wound.
A final kiss to herself.
"This one's for you, baby," she whispered.
She slid the switchblade into the sheath sewn into her coat lining.
Lit a second cigarette from the first.
Then she walked out into the storm.

***
The Velvet Hand Club wasn’t listed anywhere a clean mouth would find it. 13th Street dead-ended into a blind alley painted with peeling posters and rat piss. A red door, unmarked, pulsed faintly under a broken light.
Vivian didn't knock. She pressed her fingers — still stained faintly with her own ritual — to the buzzer.
A slit opened. A pair of eyes, bored and bloodshot.
"Password?"
She smiled, slow and poisonous.
"Tony."
The door buzzed open.
Inside, velvet ate the walls. Smoke curled from every lip of the room. The scent of whiskey, cum, and old perfume clung to the drapes like regret.
She moved through the crowd like a blade in silk.
Found him near the back — Tony "Three Fingers" Marchello.
Big. Sweaty. Smirking. Surrounded by girls too young to know better.
His gut strained against a too-tight sports jacket, polyester gleaming under the club lights. His neck glistened with old sweat, pooling in the creases like regret.
Vivian knew.
She watched him win a hand of poker. Watched the way he pulled the girls onto his lap, one hand always sneaking between trembling thighs. Watched the way he licked his fingers after.
Her stomach didn't churn. It sharpened. Every heartbeat an echo of Ellis’s final gasp.
Ellis's ghost pulsed behind her eyes. Not with grief. With permission.
She caught Tony's eye across the room.
A slow smile. A lick of her crimson mouth.
He grinned back. Hooked.
It never took much.
He made his way to her — drunk on the invitation of her mouth, not the cheap scotch in his hand.
"Didn't know they let angels slum in here," he slurred, flashing a grin greased with lust.
Vivian smiled, slow and syrupy. Let him think he was winning.
"You must be Tony," she purred, tracing the rim of his glass with one crimson-painted nail. "I hear you know how to treat a girl."
He puffed up, proud. Always proud.
Her eyes slid down, catching the flash of silver on his hand — a ring. Wrong finger. Right shape.
She let her fingertips brush it, feather-light.
"That's a pretty thing," she said, voice dipped in honey. "Must mean you're somebody."
Tony laughed. "Means I know the right people."
"The right people," she repeated, savoring the words.
Her nose twitched. That scent — sharp, clean, sour underneath the sweat — familiar.
"Nice cologne," she said, leaning in close enough that her lips almost grazed his ear. "Smells expensive. Almost... sanctified."
He shuddered under her breath.
"Gift," he mumbled. "Big boss hands 'em out. Keeps us lookin' sharp."
Big boss.
She smiled wider.
"Let's get out of here," she whispered, tongue almost brushing his lobe. "I want to see what else your boss buys you."
Tony didn’t hesitate. Men never did.
He took her hand. And sealed his fate.

***

The motel was the kind with hourly rates and mirrors too dirty to show guilt.
Tony spread out on the bed, wrists bound in silk to the headboard, cock twitching with smug anticipation.
Vivian Vale knelt between his legs, the edge of her black slip draped across her thighs. Her lipstick was smudged, her hair falling wild over one eye. Her mouth slick and hungry.
His thighs twitched under her mouth — not with fear, but with greed. The skin tasted like cheap soap, bitter sweat, and something sourer still. Power gone to rot.
She had been sucking him slow — worshipful, even. Tongue tracing the length, lips wet and warm, moaning just enough to make his head tilt back.
He was close.
Sweat beaded on his stomach. "Fuck, baby… keep going like that and I'm gonna—"
She stopped. Pulled back. Licked her lips with a slow, teasing smile.
"Not yet," she said, voice velvet and venom. "You don't get to finish without gratitude."
Tony laughed, breathless. "Jesus, you're a freak."
Vivian leaned in, kissing his inner thigh. Then lower. Her mouth wrapped around one of his balls, sucking gently. Her hand cupped the other. His moans were thick, stupid.
Then her tongue traced down, further, beneath the sac, finding the perineum. She kissed it like a benediction.
"You ever think about what it means to come?" she whispered. "You ever think about what's buried in that release?"
He didn't hear her. Or he didn't care. He just groaned, lifting his hips, chasing friction.
Vivian reached beneath the bed with her left hand. Slowly. Silently.
The switchblade was already open when her mouth pressed back to his taint — warm, soft, almost tender.
And then —
She drove the blade up. Deep. Into the soft space between scrotum and anus.
Tony screamed.
The sound cracked like a bone. His whole body bucked, wrists yanking at the headboard. His cock spasmed — and then erupted.
Blood and cum spurted from the tip.
It hit her cheek. Her chin. Her eye.
She didn't flinch.
She looked up at him as the pain spread across his face, confusion giving way to terror — his body still caught in the reflex of pleasure while the agony bled through.
She crawled up his chest, slow and slick, the knife still in one hand, his cum and blood smeared across her mouth.
She straddled his chest, leaned in close.
"I wanted your last orgasm to mean something," she whispered. "Now it's art."
Then she kissed him — full on the mouth. Her tongue pressed past his lips, and he tasted it: salt and iron. His own ruin. His own end.
The scream got caught in his throat.
She smiled against his teeth.
Then slit that throat wide open.
Blood geysered across the pillows.
Before he could fully die, she drove the blade through his chest, straight into his heart — twisting as the light left his eyes.
Vivian Vale sat back on her heels, panting. Drenched. Shaking.
She licked the blood from her fingers like frosting.
Tony's body jerked once more beneath her.
A wet, rattling breath clawed out of his throat.
Vivian tilted her head, curious, listening.
A single word bled out of his ruined mouth, barely a whisper:
"Falco..."
Her lips curved into a slow, poisonous smile.
She pressed her hand against his chest and pushed the knife deeper, twisting until the last twitch of life bled away.
Lit a cigarette with one hand, inhaled deep, then flicked ash onto the motel rug.
"That one's for Ellis," she murmured. Then her gaze dropped to his ruined cock. "And this..."
She reached down between her own legs, her fingers slick with the mix of blood and semen, still warm.
"This is for me."
She moaned as she slipped two fingers inside herself. Her back arched, eyes fluttering. The smell of iron and sex filled the room, thick as smoke. Her palm ground against her clit, each thrust a prayer, a punishment, a resurrection.
Ellis's name bloomed behind her eyes — his face, his mouth, his death.
Her body didn't care. Her body wanted this.
Wanted to ride the edge of pain and memory and release.
She fucked herself harder — no rhythm, no mercy — until her body blurred at the edges. Breath sobbing. Thighs twitching. The knife still humming under her skin.
And then —
"ELLIS!"
She screamed it like a gunshot. Her orgasm ripped through her like glass.
She collapsed forward, drenched in sweat, blood, and salt. Her face pressed into the crook of Tony's shoulder. Her hand still twitching between her legs. Her breath jagged.
For a moment, there was silence.
Then she looked around.
The sheets were soaked. Blood smeared across the headboard. Her reflection in the cracked motel mirror looked like a demon in lingerie.
She sat up slowly.
Wiped her face with the back of her hand.
Found her lipstick — Crimson Psalm — twisted it open with blood-stained fingers.
Painted her lips fresh.
Bent down.
And kissed his cooling cheek. A perfect, wet print left behind.
"You'll never forget me," she whispered. "Even in hell."
Then she stood.
Lit a final match. Kissed it into flame. Dropped it on the bloody sheets like a prayer he didn’t deserve.
And walked into the night, a prayer burning behind her.
CHAPTER 14: THE GHOST WAS THE MAYOR
It didn't strike Elena Cruz all at once.
It seeped in slowly, a poisonous tide rising by inches—scents, sounds, fragments of memory floating like splinters in her mind, waiting for a spark to ignite them into clarity.
The photograph arrived unmarked, slipped beneath her apartment door like a secret confession.
Black and white. Grainy, distant, captured from a fire escape vantage.
Vivian. Mayor Falco.
Outside The Pyramid Rose—a jazz club with a reputation dirtier than the alley behind it. Vivian stood against the brick wall, cigarette between two fingers, her eyes distant, fixed inward on a private worry. Falco leaned close, mouth near her ear, his hand barely grazing her spine. He wasn't caressing her. He was instructing her, guiding her toward whatever performance he expected inside. Vivian looked bored, annoyed—not intimate, but compliant. Oblivious to the subtle ring glinting on Falco's finger, the faint scent of expensive cologne he wore like armor.
Elena stared for a long, frozen moment. That faint, expensive cologne drifted into her memory, subtle yet lingering. Not Old Spice or some cheap aftershave—it was refined, discreetly powerful, something worn by men who wielded control. The same subtle scent had haunted her sheets after that night tangled with Vivian. She'd assumed it belonged exclusively to Falco, but now doubt crept into her mind. It wasn't unique to him—it belonged to all the men Vivian hunted.
Her heart hammered, panic surging. She remembered the file she’d secretly reviewed—the file on Ellis Monroe’s murder. The vague references to an unidentified cologne, a distinctive ring described by one frightened witness. Pieces of a puzzle she hadn’t yet solved—until now.
Her fingers trembled as she reached for the phone, her breath ragged, desperate for answers.
Vivian answered quickly, voice quiet but tense. “Elena?”
"Vivian," Cruz started, her voice edged with accusation. "The cologne, the ring—I saw a photo of you and Falco. Were you working with him? Was he involved with Ellis?"
There was a sharp silence. “Falco?” Vivian sounded confused, caught off guard. “No, Elena. I wasn’t working with him. Ellis borrowed money—from Falco’s people. It was supposed to be simple, to help us get out of this city, build something new. But Ellis got in too deep. He found things he wasn’t supposed to see—corruption, crimes Falco and his circle committed. We started gathering evidence to protect ourselves, to expose Falco’s hidden life. I never thought Falco would be the one to...” Vivian’s voice broke, grief cutting sharp.
Cruz’s voice tightened, realization dawning. “All these men—the ones you've killed—they're all connected, aren’t they? The cologne, the ring—you've been following a trail, hunting them down, trying to find Ellis's murderer. But you didn’t know exactly who it was.”
“Yes,” Vivian whispered, voice thick with sorrow. “I’ve been chasing shadows. Each man led me closer, but never close enough. Ellis gathered evidence against them all—photos, documents, recordings. It's hidden safely in my apartment. After losing him, I couldn't face it again. I couldn’t bear hearing his voice, seeing his handwriting. It was too much.”
Cruz’s breath shook, urgency rising in her voice. “Vivian, you have to show me the evidence. I can help. We can end this.”
“No, Elena,” Vivian said sharply, desperation clear. “If something happens to me, you’ll know where to find it. But right now it’s too dangerous. These men won’t hesitate to kill to keep their secrets buried.”
Cruz's heart clenched with raw emotion. “I won’t let anything happen to you.”
“You might not have that choice,” Vivian answered quietly, the line falling dead, leaving Cruz alone in aching silence.

***
Tony Marchello’s burnt motel room reeked of ash and ruin. The bed was blackened, sheets charred, a crucible of violence and loss. Tony’s scorched body sprawled grotesquely, silk bindings melted into his wrists. A smear of lipstick survived, miraculously untouched, a vivid red kiss on his ruined cheek—Vivian’s signature.
Gallagher stood beside Cruz, tie undone, sweat staining his collar, eyes narrowed, watching her every move with suspicion. His posture radiated impatience, a man unaccustomed to real work, someone who preferred comfortable answers and quick conclusions.
“This feels different,” he muttered, irritation evident in his voice. “More personal. Like you know something you’re not telling me.”
“It was personal,” Cruz replied, forcing calmness into her tone, keeping her eyes deliberately neutral.
Gallagher stepped closer, lowering his voice, a note of menace creeping in. “You know, Cruz, lately you've been running your own show a bit too much. And I’m starting to wonder why. What's got you so wrapped up in this one?”
Cruz met his gaze evenly. “I’m just doing my job, Ray. Maybe you should try doing yours.”
Gallagher’s eyes flashed angrily, his voice dropping to a growl. “Careful, Elena. There's talk, whispers from upstairs. Falco wants answers. Fast. I’ve seen him looking at you—looking at me. He thinks someone in our house isn't playing fair.”
Cruz stiffened, a surge of adrenaline coursing through her veins. Gallagher’s connection to Falco had always been rumored, his laziness and complacency more sinister now that suspicion bloomed. She chose her words carefully. “Maybe Falco should worry less about cops and more about who he's spending his time with. Plenty of dangerous men wear his cologne, don’t they?”
Gallagher stared at her, hostility evident. “You’d better watch your step, Elena. You're stepping on the wrong toes, and soon enough, there won’t be anyone around to help you.”
He turned abruptly, storming out and leaving Cruz alone in the wreckage. She stared at the lipstick mark, vivid and accusing. The faint cologne lingered, memories of Vivian’s words tumbling through her mind. She saw the masked figure clearly now—expensive scent, glinting ring, Vivian’s expression frozen in horror and recognition.
Her pulse quickened with grim determination. Every instinct screamed urgency—time was running out.
She had her clarity now. Falco had always been the ghost haunting their steps.
It was time for her to confront him directly—to end the haunting once and for all.

CHAPTER 15: THE LAST BEGGING
The rain was a slow bleed against the windowpane, tapping in frantic, uneven heartbeats.
Cruz stood at Vivian's door, soaked through, her badge still clipped to her belt, her mouth trembling in ways she couldn't control. She hadn't called. Hadn't planned. Her hands smelled like gunpowder and cheap coffee. Her heart like confession. Every pulse in her throat felt too loud.
Inside, a worn jazz record played low, Billie Holiday murmuring broken sweetness into the apartment’s damp breath.
Vivian opened the door without speaking. She was barefoot, wrapped in a silk robe that clung to her thighs, damp at the hem where the floor kissed her skin. Her lipstick was half-smeared, the ghost of a smile where her mouth had once been fierce.
She stepped back.
Cruz entered.
Neither spoke. The click of the door closing was louder than the thunder. The sound echoed through Cruz's ribs like a second heartbeat.

***

Cruz kissed her first.
It wasn't elegant. It wasn't even a decision. It was need collapsing all her training into a mouth on a mouth, a groan swallowed between teeth. Vivian caught her wrists mid-grasp, pulled her closer, their bodies crashing like the storm outside.
The rain hammered the windows harder, a stuttering percussion against the heat rising between them.
Vivian's fingers trailed down, tugging Cruz's wet blouse free from her jeans. Tugging the badge off her hip and letting it clatter to the floor.
"No titles tonight," Vivian whispered, voice low, reverent. Cruz could feel the words against her mouth more than hear them.
Cruz nodded, her breath hitching audibly, body already vibrating with too much sensation.
Vivian pulled the blouse over Cruz's head in a single motion. Dragged the soaked jeans down, slow, worshipful, brushing knuckles along the trembling muscles of Cruz's thighs.
Cruz stood there—bare, trembling, nipples pebbling against the cool air, breath catching in sharp, uneven bursts. Her skin almost buzzed where Vivian's hands had been.
Vivian dropped to her knees.
Kissed the inside of her thighs, lips trailing wet, open-mouthed prayers against salt-slick skin. Cruz whimpered again, her pulse hammering so hard in her neck she was sure Vivian could hear it.
Cruz shivered violently when Vivian's tongue flicked against the soft crease where thigh met hip. Her fingernails scraped against the wall behind her, searching for something to ground herself, the texture of the paint biting under her nails.
"Say it," Cruz whispered, broken, voice vibrating on a shallow gasp.
Vivian's voice was a blade slid between ribs: "Mine."
Cruz shuddered again, a sound escaping her throat like a sob strangled halfway out, breath shuddering against Vivian's hair.
Vivian rose and led her to the bed. Sat down first, legs open, robe slipping off her shoulders to pool around her hips. She opened herself wide, knees spread, back straight, arms stretched out, offering herself like a throne built of need.
She pulled Cruz into her lap.
Cruz straddled her, knees pressed into the mattress on either side, thighs slick with sweat and rain, trembling from more than just the cold. Their skin brushed and Cruz's lungs stuttered, breath snagging on the wet, fevered contact.
She sank down until their bodies sealed—slick, pulsing, aching—and a broken gasp tore from both their throats.
Their foreheads pressed together. Their breaths tangled, catching, hitching, staggering. Vivian's hands rested at the small of Cruz's back, guiding her, rocking her, slow and deliberate, fingertips dragging light shudders up her spine like ripples over water.
Cruz rocked her hips, desperate for friction. Vivian guided her with patience that felt like cruelty and mercy at once. She kissed Cruz's throat, her shoulder, the soft hollow of her collarbone—each kiss slow enough that Cruz could feel the tremble in Vivian's lips.
"Let me," Vivian whispered, her breath warm and breaking against Cruz's skin.
Cruz let go, a whimper escaping as she did.
Vivian slipped her hand between them, fingers finding Cruz's wet heat, stroking slow circles. Cruz gasped—an ugly, beautiful sound—her breath catching on every stroke, her chest shuddering.
Cruz's fingernails scraped down Vivian's back, leaving faint, trembling trails. Every shift of Vivian's fingers pulled another broken moan from Cruz's mouth.
When Cruz came, it was messy. Guttural. She cried out, clinging to Vivian like a drowning woman to a rock, sobbing into the curve of her neck. Her thighs spasmed around Vivian's hips, muscles locking, then shivering uncontrollably.
Vivian kissed her temple, her jaw, her mouth, swallowing the broken sounds with tenderness that cut sharper than any knife.
But Cruz wasn't done.
She pushed Vivian back onto the bed, reversed herself, straddling Vivian facing away.
Vivian's body arched beneath her, her arms thrown back, fingers clutching the sheets so tightly the knuckles whitened. Her legs spread wider, trembling with each labored breath. Her head tilted back over the edge of the bed, blonde hair spilling over like a golden wound.
The rain echoed through the room, steady and relentless, like applause for something they shouldn't survive.
Cruz gripped Vivian's hips, grinding herself down, slow at first, then desperate. Vivian's gasps turned into moans, into cries, into something wordless and sacred, each sound jagged with need.
The room smelled of sweat, rain, salt, and something holy breaking open.
Cruz reached between them, fingertips finding Vivian's clit, rubbing it in tight, reverent circles. Vivian arched so hard her back lifted clean off the bed, a scream torn from her throat—raw, unfiltered, devastating.
Her orgasm hit like a seizure—full-body, trembling, a sob collapsing into a moan. Her thighs clamped around Cruz, nails digging into the sheets, trying to anchor herself to the world.
Her breath hitched violently, hips twitching, voice splintering into tiny broken sounds she couldn't hold back. Cruz could feel the shudders radiating from her like aftershocks.
Cruz stayed there, holding her, kissing the arch of Vivian's spine as she shook herself apart, her lips dragging soothing, shuddering trails down slick skin.
When it ended, they crumpled together.
No words. Just the sticky thrum of bodies remembering, the rain still tapping, tapping, like a second pulse against the windows.
Vivian's breath hitched against Cruz's throat, small, shuddering gasps she couldn't fully swallow. She tucked herself tighter into Cruz's body without thinking, her bare legs tangling with Cruz's, her hand fisting in the damp sheets.
Cruz stroked her back in slow, reverent passes—up her spine, over her shoulder blades—feeling the slight tremble that still pulsed through Vivian's frame.
Neither of them spoke.
Vivian shifted closer, her forehead pressing against the curve where Cruz's neck met shoulder, lips brushing skin but never quite forming words. Every breath she took seemed stolen from somewhere deeper, a memory she couldn't name.
Cruz closed her eyes and let her, cradling her without pressure, letting Vivian burrow and cling as if anchoring herself to something she didn't believe could hold.
The rain thickened outside. The window fogged. The record spun to silence, leaving only the sound of breathing, of heartbeat against heartbeat.
Somewhere between the shallow gasps, a flicker—the scent of Ellis's cologne, ghosting past Cruz's nose. A hum of old jazz that hadn't played. A whisper in Vivian's broken breathing that wasn't quite hers.
Cruz blinked, heart stuttering, but the room stayed the same. Just rain. Just breath. Just bodies.
For now.
Vivian finally whispered, so soft Cruz almost missed it: "Stay."
Cruz kissed her temple without answering, because she was already staying.


***
Time shifted. The record clicked over. A new track ghosted into the room—something slow, wordless, almost too fragile to exist.
Vivian rose first. Her robe slipped off completely, leaving her bare but for the river of sweat down her spine. She crossed the room without looking back, opened a drawer Cruz hadn't noticed.
She pulled out a battered folder. Cassette tapes. Polaroids. Handwritten notes.
As she dropped it onto the bed between them, Cruz heard it—a breath that didn’t belong to either of them, a sigh stitched into the rain.
Cruz flinched like it might burn her.
Her fingers, without thinking, scrabbled for the badge lying discarded on the floor. She gripped it in her palm until the metal edges bit into her skin.
"Ellis was trying to buy us a future," Vivian said. Her voice cracked, a raw edge scraping against the words.
Cruz nodded without meaning to, mouthing silent prayers in Spanish under her breath, the old ones her mother used to whisper before lighting candles no one believed in.
As Vivian spoke, a faint, sour-sweet scent of blood and cologne ghosted into Cruz's nose, like someone exhaled memory straight into her mouth.
"He took a loan. From Falco's people. Promised we'd run—a house somewhere, out of this fucking city."
Cruz pressed the badge harder into her palm.
Vivian's fingers trembled against a photo. The tape recorder beside the folder hissed suddenly, even though no one had touched it—a soft, broken static, like a heartbeat skipping.
"He thought if we just disappeared... if we just loved loud enough and far enough away..." Vivian’s voice splintered. "We could be real."
Cruz touched a tape with the pad of her finger. It hissed again, a breath caught between confession and collapse. She jerked her hand back, trembling.
"It started with protecting us," Vivian continued, voice fraying at the edges. "But he found... more. Photos. Payments. Names. Enough to ruin them."
She knelt by the bed, like she was confessing to an altar.
"Falco found out," she said. Her hands shook. She gripped the edge of the bed to still them. "That night. While I—while he—"
Her throat closed. Tears glazed her eyes but didn’t fall. Her mouth opened and closed, a drowning woman trying to name the water.
The mattress dipped slightly. Cruz's heart stopped. For one dizzy second, it felt like another body had shifted weight beside her—Ellis, maybe. Or only her grief.
Cruz closed her eyes, forehead pressing to the edge of the bed as if it could hold her up. She whispered fragments under her breath—Dios mio... Santa Maria...—words crumbling before they could become salvation.
"I was..." Vivian whispered. "I was coming. I was..."
She pressed her fist to her mouth, crushed the sound back.
"He died loving me," Vivian gasped. "He... he bled into my..."
Cruz felt her whole body lock, a silent, breathless sob caught in her ribs.
Somewhere between Vivian's broken sentences, Cruz thought she heard it—Ellis's voice, soft and ragged: "Don't let her fall alone."
She squeezed her eyes shut harder, the rain swallowing the echo before she could be sure.
"He let me live," Vivian whispered. "Said even my joy belonged to him."
The room trembled with the weight of it.
Cruz opened her mouth to speak. Nothing came out. She gripped her crushed badge tighter, blood pricking her palm.
Vivian leaned forward. Eyes burning.
"I'm going to kill him."
Not a threat.
Scripture.
Cruz's fingers closed tighter around the badge and the folder like they were the only things tethering her to breath.
Vivian kissed her forehead.
"You don't have to choose tonight," she said, voice raw with unshed sobs. "But tomorrow—you will."
Outside, the rain thickened.
Cruz stayed kneeling long after Vivian stood and turned away, mouthing prayers against the cold metal, the ghost of Vivian's touch still burning into skin that had only just learned how to tremble.
And somewhere in the dark corners of the room, grief waited—wet-lipped, patient—ready to open its mouth wider.
CHAPTER 16: CRIMSON PSALM
The morning bled into Vivian Vale's bedroom like smoke. Gray light seeped through the cracked window, pulling the rain in with it—a steady hiss against the glass, like the city was trying to apologize too late.
Elena Cruz lay still in the bed.
The sheets were damp with sweat, tangled around bare legs and bruised hips. Vivian's body was a slow, steady weight against her side, one thigh thrown over her possessively.
The room smelled of sex, cigarettes, and the unspoken grief that had coiled around them the night before.
Cruz stared at the cracked ceiling.
In the peeling wallpaper and water stains, she could almost see the fire again. The motel. The bloodied mattress where Vivian had left a man's body cooling in a pool of semen and gasoline.
And she—good cop, loyal daughter, guilty Catholic—had kissed Vivian anyway.
Vivian stirred. She rolled onto her back, one arm stretching lazily over her head, exposing the pale, vulnerable line of her throat.
Her voice rasped into the stillness.
"Thinking about the fire already, Detective?"
Cruz said nothing.
Vivian smiled without opening her eyes.
"He deserved it. The fire. The blood. Some stains don't wash out."
Rain pattered harder against the window, filling the pause like a second heartbeat.
"Sometimes," Vivian murmured, "you have to burn it all down just to breathe again."
Cruz turned her head, studying the way morning light bruised itself across Vivian's bare skin. No apology there. No shame. Only a terrible, aching peace—the kind that comes after you stop pretending there's any other way.
"Did it help?" Cruz asked, voice raw.
Vivian opened her eyes then—glassy, fathomless.
"Not enough," she said.
Cruz lifted a hand, almost without meaning to. She brushed her thumb across Vivian's bottom lip, where the last ghost of last night's Crimson Psalm clung—a bruised halo, a wound without blood.
Vivian caught her hand gently. Turned it. Pressed a kiss into her palm.
Then she let go.
And Cruz stayed.

***
The rain hadn't let up when Cruz stepped outside.
The city pressed heavy against her, steaming and slick, gutters choking on runoff and last night's sins. Somewhere down the block, a siren wailed and cut out like a throat being slit. Neon flickered off puddles that slicked the cracked concrete, casting sickly halos around drowned cigarette butts and broken bottles.
The alley smelled of wet garbage, cheap whiskey, and something metallic underneath—like blood that had never quite been scrubbed away.
Cruz hunched deeper into her coat and moved quickly down the alley.
Gallagher waited near the mouth of it, propped against a rusted dumpster tagged with graffiti so old the letters bled together. Rain sheeted from the brim of his hat. His shoulders sagged like a man carrying a burden he had stopped pretending he could set down.
He had been tailing her all night. She saw it now—the slump of his spine, the weary way his eyes tracked her approach without conviction.
"Falco wanted you watched," Gallagher said without preamble, voice roughened by cold and regret. "Told me to keep you close. Keep you stupid."
Cruz said nothing. She just stared at him, rain running into her collar, the city's noises pulsing like a weak heartbeat around them.
Gallagher scratched at the side of his jaw, water dripping from his fingers. "I was good at it. For a while. Figured you'd trip yourself up without much help."
He shifted against the dumpster, the motion heavy, exhausted. A broken bottle crunched under his boot.
"But last night—" He shook his head. "Sitting there, watching you... made me think."
Another beat of rain-soaked silence. The wind rattled a dented fire escape above them, metal groaning like a tired lung.
"I been a coward a long time, kid," Gallagher said, voice low. "Thought survival meant loyalty. Thought if I just kept my head down, I could slide into retirement with a pension and a few regrets."
He huffed a bitter breath, steam clouding the air between them.
"But Falco... he doesn't let go. You work for him, you don't retire. You rot. You drown in it."
He fished into his coat, pulled out a brass key, dangling from a cracked motel tag that swung in the wet air like a condemned man's pendant.
"Back door," he muttered. "Maintenance entrance. Not his mansion—the real place. His private nest. You didn't hear it from me."
Cruz took the key without hesitation. Their fingers brushed—brief, cold, irrevocable.
Gallagher looked at her then—really looked—and the rain painted deep lines into his face, tracing every compromise he'd ever made.
"You're smarter than me," he said. "Don't let this city make you forget it."
She turned without a word.
He didn’t follow. He just stood there, watching the rain scrub the neon off the broken pavement, a man finally too tired to run from the truth.
Maybe he was tired of chasing ghosts too.

***
The rain had finally let up, but the city remained cold and heavy, the air thick with the scent of wet concrete and wilted cigarette smoke.
Cruz approached the church slowly, boots slapping through shallow puddles, her coat heavy on her shoulders. Vivian had told her where to meet—had whispered it the night before, her breath hot against Cruz's ear, a time and a place carved out between confessions and touches too desperate to name.
Iglesia del Silencio—once holy, now a mausoleum of broken glass and rotting wood—waited like a broken mouth ready to swallow prayers it no longer believed.
Cruz hesitated at the threshold.
The church smelled of mildew and ash. The wet stone walls wept silently. Glass crunched under her boots with every step. It felt wrong to breathe here, like every inhalation was a trespass.
She thought about how easy it would be to turn around. How the old Cruz—the good detective, the dutiful daughter—would have walked away.
But she wasn’t that woman anymore.
She stepped forward. Boots splashing through shallow puddles, scattering the broken colors into chaos.
Rain still dripped through the gaping wounds in the roof, pattering against the cracked marble altar and pooling across the ruined floor. The stained glass, shattered by time and storms, threw bruised light across the wet stone.
Vivian stood at the center of it all, a silhouette against the drowning light.
She wore black.
Not mourning black. War black.
The Crimson Psalm was perfect on her mouth, painted with slow, deliberate reverence. A wound kissed into shape.
A wet strand of hair clung to her cheek, trembling with each shallow breath she tried to hide.
Their eyes locked across the flooded nave.
Cruz felt the gravity of it—the inevitability—like a weight dragging her chest open.
She reached out first. She brushed the soaked strand of hair from Vivian's forehead, her fingers trembling not from fear—but from the terrible clarity of love.
Vivian caught her wrist. Held it. Not to stop her. To tether her.
"Don't stop me," Vivian said, her voice low, steady as the air between them.
Cruz tightened her grip against Vivian's jaw, grounding them both.
"I won't," she whispered.
 leaned in, and they kissed—hard, wet, unholy. A kiss written not in forgiveness, but in war.
Cruz's mind fractured under the touch. Fragments blooming sharp behind her eyes: I was already gone. I never had a choice.
The ruined church around them seemed to hum, the echoes of old prayers swallowed by the rain-soaked silence.
When Vivian pulled back, she smiled—small, sharp, a wound shaped like a woman.
Cruz reached into her coat, pulling something from an inside pocket. She pressed the cold metal into Vivian's palm without speaking.
The key to Falco’s private nest.
Vivian closed her fingers around it slowly. The metal burned cold against her palm. Not just a key. A doorway into the filth Falco thought no one would ever reach. Their hands lingered, a tether stretched too tight.
"You could follow me," Vivian said, voice barely above a breath. Not a plea. Not quite.
Cruz’s throat worked, but no words came. The choice sat between them, sharp and terrible.
And Vivian—strong, defiant, aching Vivian—felt a crack splinter deep inside. A part of her wanted Cruz to say yes. Wanted to be selfish. Wanted to be saved.
But some prayers were already written in blood.
Vivian squeezed Cruz's hand—brief, fierce—and let go.
She smiled—small, sharp, a wound shaped like a woman.
Then she turned and walked into the storm.
Her trench coat flared behind her like a battle flag stitched in grief.
Her heels clicked against the flooded stone, slipping once before finding their rhythm. Somewhere high above, a broken pane of glass rattled against its frame—the dying breath of the church.
She was already gone. I just hadn't learned how to stay yet.
Cruz stayed standing in the ruin, heart hammering against the broken world, waiting for the city to bleed.

***
The rain had stopped, but the city was still weeping.
Vivian stepped from the crumbling chapel into the thick, cold air, her heels clicking against the drowned pavement, slipping once before she found her stride. The gutters overflowed, slick and stinking, steam curling up from the broken streets where the sun wouldn't come.
Neon buzzed weakly through the mist, the colors bleeding into the puddles—red, gold, a sickly green. Somewhere far off, a siren cut the air in half before dying away, swallowed whole by the wet concrete.
Vivian moved through it all like a prayer on fire.
The Crimson Psalm glowed fresh against her mouth, perfect despite the rain that had tried to drown it. Beneath her coat, the key Gallagher had passed burned cold against her skin, tucked close to her heart. Her fingers brushed the hidden knife once, a silent invocation.
She didn't rush. Didn't look back.
Behind her, the church sagged into the fog, and somewhere inside it, Cruz remained—a tether Vivian could still feel pulling at the hollow place behind her ribs.
She pressed forward.
Each step was a benediction. Each breath an act of war.
Somewhere beneath her heels, the city's pulse thudded slow and broken, a heart too tired to pray.
The city watched from broken windows and leaking rooftops. Held its breath. Waited.
Vivian Vale walked into the drowning streets, the Crimson Psalm singing silent on her mouth.
Tonight, the city would bleed with her.

CHAPTER 17: THE BODY IS THE EVIDENCE
Falco's sanctuary smelled like whiskey, stale sweat, and the lies of men who wore crucifixes over cum-stained hearts.
 
The carpet was wine-stained. The velvet drapes clung to the humid breath of old sins. A battered Bible lay on the nightstand, spine broken, pages stained with fingerprints.
 
Vivian Vale slipped through the unlocked door like a whispered threat. Crimson Psalm smeared fresh on her mouth. Knife strapped to her thigh. The ghost of Ellis humming under her skin like static.
 
He was waiting.
 
Falco stood bare in the candlelight—cock hard, veins bulging, crucifix swinging like a false promise against his chest. His smirk was the kind men wore before slaughter or surrender.
 
"Come to confess?" he rasped, voice already thick with the heat of it.
 
Vivian let the trench coat fall from her shoulders. Beneath it, she wore a thin black slip—clinging to her damp skin like a second breath. She lifted her hands, hooked her fingers into the straps, and dragged them slowly down each bare shoulder.
 
The slip collapsed at her feet in a soft sigh of fabric.
 
She stood naked before him—a vision drenched in sin and sanctity.
 
Her skin flushed and glistening in the candlelight. Full breasts swaying slightly with each breath. Nipples hard, kissed dark by the cold and the hunger coiling under her skin. Her waist tapered to hips built for ruin, thighs sleek and trembling, a glistening slickness glinting between them.
 
Falco sucked in a breath—ragged, greedy.
 
His cock twitched, the hardest it had ever been in his life. Harder than for any whore, any mistress, any altar boy fantasy he'd buried under sermons and politics.
 
This was new.
 
This was everything.
 
The ultimate foreplay: fucking a goddess made of grief and murder. Knowing he would kill her. Savoring it. Worshipping it.
 
His heart pounded harder than it ever had behind a podium, inside a confession booth, between the thighs of a power-hungry socialite.
 
This was salvation.
 
This was damnation.
 
And he wanted it more than absolution.
 
Vivian smiled—a slow, sharp thing—and stepped forward.
 
"Come to finish it," she said.
 
He laughed—a wet, greedy sound—and beckoned her forward with two fingers, the way you'd summon a stray to your lap.
 
She crossed the room slow. Heavy. Sacred. Each step a funeral drum. Her cunt glistened in the low light, the scent of her arousal thickening the air like rain before a storm.
 
She straddled him like mounting a broken god.
 
He gasped as she sank down, the head of his cock breaching her folds—wet heat swallowing him inch by inch—until he was buried in her to the hilt.
 
The slow grind of her hips was a dirge.

***
The fucking was furious from the start. No tenderness. No illusions.
 
Vivian rode him with murder in her hips, blood already singing in her teeth. Her nails raked pink welts into his chest. Sweat beaded on her brow, dripping onto his skin.
 
"Do you know," she whispered, her breath hot and sour with grief, "whose ghost you're inside?"
 
Falco grunted, thrusting up into her like he could fuck the judgment out of his soul.
 
"Does it matter?" he hissed through his teeth. "He died in a woman's lap like a good little whore."
 
Vivian smiled.
 
Sharp. Shaking.
 
"Say his name," she whispered, grinding harder, her thighs slapping against his.
 
He bared his teeth, spit it out between thrusts.
 
"Ellis. The pretty corpse."
 
Vivian closed her eyes.
 
Felt the tremor start deep—low in her womb, rippling outward. The inevitability gathering like a storm.
 
Her cunt clenched around him, slick with grief and rage.
 
She leaned down, her lips brushing the shell of his ear, and whispered:
 
"You killed him while I was coming."
 
The knife was in her hand before he saw it.
 
His was already in his.
 
The blades moved almost together—a desperate, furious kiss of steel.
 
Vivian slashed his throat in one clean, holy arc—just as Falco drove his blade into her side.
 
The world exploded.
 
Blood erupted.
 
His.
 
Hers.
 
Theirs.
 
Hot and thick between them, spraying her chest, her thighs, splattering the sheets like a final benediction.
 
But neither stopped.
 
They fucked through it.
 
Dying.
 
Clutching.
 
Bleeding.
 
Climaxing.
 
Vivian cried out, hips snapping down, grinding her clit against his dying cock as she came—long, shuddering, helpless. Her body seized and spasmed around him, a sacred convulsion of rage and resurrection.
 
Her thighs clamped like they had around Ellis. That night. That breath. That ruin.
 
Blood bubbled from Falco's torn throat, misting her skin, soaking her hair. The sound of his gurgling—wet, raw, animal—rattled against her ribs.
 
And as the orgasm ripped her apart, she moaned against his dying mouth:
 
"I came while he died. Now I come while you do. That’s justice."
 
Falco's cock jerked inside her—spasming helplessly, his life pouring out in gurgling sobs.
 
She grabbed his face as he sagged beneath her, forcing his gaze to stay on hers—fingers digging into his blood-slick cheeks.
 
"You die inside me," she gasped, her body trembling with aftershocks, every muscle clenching against the slow slide into collapse, "just like he did."
 
Falco's mouth moved. A whisper drowned in blood.
 
"No... you... you made it holy..."
 
Then his eyes glazed.
 
His body twitched once.
 
Twice.
 
And stilled.

***
Vivian sat astride his corpse, panting. Her breath shuddered against the quiet, broken only by the slow drip of blood hitting the floor. Blood and cum leaked from between her thighs, streaking her skin in sacred ruin. Her hair clung to her face, matted with sweat and sin.
 
The wound in her side burned—each heartbeat a jagged fist against torn flesh.
 
She rocked slightly. Once. Twice. Trying to summon the strength to move.
 
The metallic tang of blood filled her mouth, thick and nauseating, as she breathed through parted lips.
 
She pulled herself off him—a sick, wet sound—and stumbled backward, the room tilting, slipping, vanishing. Her knees buckled and she collapsed onto the blood-soaked floor.
 
The coolness of blood pooled beneath her thighs, seeping into her skin like an unwanted baptism.
 
The stink of iron and death and semen wrapped around her like a lover.
 
Her breath hitched in shallow gasps. Her vision narrowed to a flickering pinprick of candlelight, then nothing at all.
 
She was slipping.
 
Slipping.
 
—
 
The door burst open.
 
Cruz.
 
Gun drawn.
 
Breathless.
 
Eyes wide. Wild. Already breaking.
 
She froze—the sight before her gutting whatever scraps of professionalism still clung to her bones.
 
Vivian naked, bloodied, ruined.
 
Falco dead beneath her, throat yawning open like a second mouth.
 
The room a cathedral of sin and revenge.
 
Cruz dropped the gun.
 
Ran.
 
Fell to her knees—skidding through blood, palms slipping, voice catching in her throat.
 
"Vivian—"
 
The name tore from her, half-sob, half-prayer.
 
Vivian tried to smile. Failed. Her mouth just twitched, blood bubbling at the corner.
 
Cruz pressed trembling hands to the wound—useless against the tide. Her fingertips slipping, smearing blood into wounds she couldn't close.
 
Under her hands, Vivian's pulse fluttered—a weak, terrified bird trapped under skin.
 
"Stay with me," Cruz whispered, her voice cracking open like a wound, soft as ash, raw as penance. "Please—please—don't—"
 
Vivian's eyes fluttered. Half-closed. Breath shallow.
 
Maybe she heard. Maybe she didn't.
 
Cruz cradled her against her chest, rocking them both in the ruin of the bed, the night, the city.
 
Blood soaked into Cruz's blouse. Into her skin. Into her fucking soul.
 
She didn't pray.
 
She just held on.
 
Held on like maybe love could plug the holes.
 
Held on like maybe regret could turn back time.
 
Held on like maybe, just maybe, Vivian was still inside that broken, beautiful body.
 
And somewhere far below the sirens and the shame—the city wept.

CHAPTER 18: SHE CAME IN BLOOD. I LET HER.
The sirens were closer now.
Elena moved fast.
She grabbed a bedsheet off the unmade bed, ripped a long strip free with shaking hands, and pressed it hard against the worst of the bleeding. Blood soaked through almost immediately. She added pressure, cursing under her breath, then tore another strip—this one longer—and tied it tightly around Vivian’s waist to hold the first in place. A crude, desperate bandage. It wasn’t perfect. But it would have to be enough.
Elena found a towel in the marble bathroom—white, too clean, too soft—and wiped Vivian’s body fast but gentle, pulling a discarded dress shirt over her shoulders, buttoning it wrong. She grabbed Vivian's slip from the floor, found her heels under the bed, and wrapped everything together with the trench coat—scooping up any trace that might've been left behind. Slung her trench coat around her, hiding the worst of it.
"Stay with me," Elena whispered, voice splintering. "Please, baby, stay."
Vivian's lashes fluttered. A ghost of a smile. Then nothing.
Elena dragged her into the hallway. Down the back stairwell, footsteps swallowed by rain and rot. Through a service door that screeched once — too loud — then into the night.
The car was waiting. Gallagher's car.
He sat behind the wheel, engine idling, a cigarette dangling from his lips.
"Jesus Christ," he muttered when he saw Vivian. "You weren't kidding."
Elena hoisted Vivian into the back seat, cradling her like a fallen saint.
Gallagher tossed the cigarette into the gutter, crushed it under his boot.
"Drove like a fucking maniac getting here," he grumbled. "Probably blew my pension on toll tickets."
"You retired?" Elena rasped, shoving herself into the seat beside Vivian.
Gallagher pulled into traffic without looking. The rain blurred the city into a smudged confession.
"Turned in my badge this morning. Threw it at the Captain's fat head. Should’ve seen the look on that bastard’s face. Like someone pissed on his last donut."
Elena gave a choked laugh. It cracked something in her chest.
She looked at him, really looked—and for the first time, she saw not the broken man, not the relic of a precinct that ate its own. Just another sinner trying to leave the world a little less bloody than he found it.
"Thank you," she whispered.
Gallagher didn’t speak. He just nodded once, eyes on the wet black road.

***
They hid her.
A retired paramedic Gallagher trusted. A basement apartment. Old supplies. No paperwork.
Elena stayed with  through the fever, the stitching, the shivers that rattled her bones. She bathed her. Fed her soup with trembling hands. Pressed kisses to her damp forehead when the nightmares came.
Days blurred.
The city rotted above them. But here, in this dim cocoon, something else bloomed.
Vivian lived.
Scarred. Frail. Glorious.
And one night—weeks later, when the stitches were just thin silver ghosts on her skin—Vivian crawled into Elena's lap like it was the most natural thing in the world.
No blood between them.
No ghosts.
Just skin. Breath. The soft gasp of a woman who finally dared to live.
Elena lay back against the battered couch, pulling Vivian over her. Their bodies fitted together like a memory they hadn’t lived yet.
Vivian kissed her.
Not hungrily. Not desperately.
Tender.
A mouth learning how to worship without asking for forgiveness.
Elena cupped Vivian's face in both hands, thumbs stroking the damp corners of her mouth, feeling every tremble. Vivian's hands moved under Elena's shirt—slow, reverent—fingertips grazing ribs, sternum, the heartbeat that had only ever raced for her.
"I’m here," Elena whispered into her mouth. "I’m yours."
Vivian shuddered.
Her slip slid up as she straddled Elena's lap, thighs parting with the lazy grace of surrender. Elena’s hands found the curve of her hips, steadying her, guiding her down.
Vivian's pussy was slick, hot, alive.
They gasped into each other's mouths as Elena entered her slowly with two fingers—no rush, no pressure, just an invitation to stay.
Vivian rocked against her hand—forehead pressed to Elena's temple, breathing like prayer.
Every roll of her hips whispered: still here, still yours, still breathing.
Elena kissed the shell of Vivian’s ear.
"Let go," she murmured. "You're safe."
Vivian sobbed—but it wasn't grief. It was awe.
She moved faster, clenching around Elena's fingers, slickness soaking her palm. Elena held her close, stroked her clit in slow, steady circles until Vivian gasped, broke, bloomed.
Vivian came with a soft cry, forehead collapsing to Elena's shoulder, thighs trembling.
Elena kissed the crown of her head.
Held her through the aftershocks.
No blood.
No death.
Just breath. Just skin. Just two women surviving themselves.

***
The rain was soft that morning—not a storm, just a weep. The kind that made everything shine.
Elena stood on the sidewalk outside her building, coat open, collar damp, hair sticking to her neck like a hand that hadn’t let go.
Red lipstick stained her mouth.
Crimson Psalm.
It wasn’t hers.
She looked in the mirror of a shop window.
There she was.
Not a cop. Not a detective. Not even the woman she used to be.
Just Elena. Marked by everything she chose to love. Everything she chose to survive.
She touched her reflection.
The glass was cold.
Vivian might’ve been behind her. Or not. The scent was still there—perfume, blood, sweat. A memory with fingers.
Elena didn’t turn around.
Didn’t need to.
Because Vivian was in her breath now. In her hips. In the space between each heartbeat.
The rain eased.
The sun cracked through the clouds in brittle beams.
Steam rose from the asphalt, a ghostly breath from the city's mouth. The streets shimmered, smoked, peeled themselves free of the night's sorrow. Sidewalks glistened under the newborn light, tendrils of mist curling into the morning air like a final whispered prayer.
It was the first peace Elena had ever felt.
Because Elena didn’t solve the case.
She surrendered to it.
Because love wasn’t the point.
Because truth didn’t save her.
Because Vivian came in blood.
And Elena chose to stay.
